THE  IMPACT  OF  HURRICANE  KATRINA  ON  THE 

AVIATION  INDUSTRY

S.  HRG.  109–231

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

SEPTEMBER  14,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

25–443 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION 

CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Ranking 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 14, 2005 .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Gruenspecht, Dr. Howard K., Deputy Administrator, U.S. Energy Information 
Administration .....................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
May,  James  C.,  President  and  CEO,  Air  Transport  Association  of  America, 
Inc. .........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
McElroy, Deborah C., President, Regional Airline Association ...........................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Miller, Frank, Airport Director, Pensacola Regional Airport ...............................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement ...........
Lautenberg,  Hon.  Frank  R.,  U.S.  Senator  from  New  Jersey,  prepared  state-
ment ......................................................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1
1
29
2
2

3
5

7
10
19
21
14
17

35

36

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

THE  IMPACT  OF  HURRICANE  KATRINA  ON 

THE  AVIATION  INDUSTRY 

WEDNESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  14,  2005

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

Washington, DC. 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:03 a.m. in room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Conrad  Burns, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator  BURNS.  I  am  going  to  call  this  Committee  to  order,  and 
we  have  other  Members  coming.  We  also  have  an  11  o’clock  vote. 
So  we  are  going  to  hold  your  statements  down  as  much  as  we  can 
and  get  to  hear  from  our  panel  this  morning,  and  I  want  to  thank 
the panel for joining us. 

We  have  a  lot  of  ground  to  cover.  Ever  since  Katrina  decided  to 
pay  a  visit  to  our  southern  shores,  we  have  been  in  a  situation 
where  it  is  going  to  take  some  real  work  and  working  together  to 
get  us  out  of  it.  As  you  know,  it  is  our  responsibility  as  a  Sub-
committee  to  start  evaluating  ideas  on  how  we  can  assist  the  re-
gion and the affected industries in the coming days ahead. 

I  am  hopeful  that  the  panel  today  can  provide  suggestions  on 
how  their  respective  industries  can  be  aided  by  cutting  through 
some  red  tape  using  waivers  or  possible  legislative  proposals.  I 
know  at  times  like  this  we  have  a  tendency  to  think  legislation  is 
necessary when sometimes it is not. It is just doing the things that 
we should be doing in order to assist those who have been impacted 
by this storm to recover. 

The  greatest  concern  to  the  industry  now  is  fuel  prices  and  sup-
plies.  The  Gulf  Coast  region  accounts  for  about  23  percent  of  the 
U.S.  jet  fuel  production.  We  witnessed  a  dramatic  spike  in  fuel 
prices in the direct aftermath of the storm. Fortunately, they have 
started  to  come  down  now  but,  unfortunately,  they  are  still  at 
record  levels,  and  we  are  only  starting  to  see  the  onset  of  tropical 
storm  season  which  could  have  increasingly  dynamic  effects  on  jet 
fuel  prices  for  some  time  to  come.  So  we  have  got  some  tough 
months  ahead  for  this  industry  regardless  of  what  Congress  does 
or does not act upon. 

Both  United  and  US  Airways  are  in  bankruptcy.  And  reports 
show  that  Delta  and  Northwest  are  heading  into  Chapter  11  also, 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

and that may be closer than we think. If fuel prices maintain these 
levels, more will certainly follow. 

On  a  final  note,  I  would  like  to  commend  those  in  the  aviation 
industry  for  their  response  to  Katrina  and  its  victims.  The  airlift 
operations were tremendously helpful to the region, and our thanks 
goes  out  to  the  entire  community:  Commercial  carriers,  business 
aviation,  airports,  and  general  aviation  alike.  And  I  would  like  to 
thank this panel for coming today. We appreciate your time. 

Senator McCain. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator MCCAIN. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you 
for the timeliness of this hearing. As we see and are greeted by this 
morning’s  headlines  that  two  airlines  are  likely  to  go  into  bank-
ruptcy  and  perhaps  some  of  our  witnesses,  particularly,  Mr.  May, 
might  describe  to  us  what  he  feels  is  the  future  of  the  aviation  in-
dustry with or without Hurricane Katrina, because the price of fuel 
had gone up dramatically prior to the hurricane, which is what has 
brought  two  additional  airlines  to  the  brink  of,  or  actual,  bank-
ruptcy. 

I notice that Ms. McElroy has a proposal to declare a moratorium 
on various taxes and fees that are imposed on the airlines. I do not 
think we should ignore any option. I guess that when those fees are 
suspended  we  would  have  to  make  up  for  that  shortfall,  and  I 
would be interested in ideas as to how we would do that. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  come  here  this  morning  with  a  lot  more 
questions  than  answers,  and  I  am  sure  that  our  witnesses  share 
our deepening concern. I think that the airlines have been in crisis 
in the past, but I am not sure I have seen anything quite approach-
ing  this  and  so  maybe  we  ought  to  try  to  get  some  different  ideas. 
So,  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  thank  the  witnesses  for  being 

here today. 

Senator BURNS. Senator Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Chairman, if we are going to have a vote at 
11  o’clock,  I  would  like  to  get  through  all  these  things  if  we  could. 
Thank you very much. 

Senator BURNS. And, thank you, Senator. 
We will roll right along this morning and get into this discussion. 
I  think  the  panel  before  us  is  a  very  important  panel.  We  have 
Dr.  Howard  K.  Gruenspecht,  Deputy  Administrator,  U.S.  Energy 
Information Administration; and Mr. James May, who is President 
and  CEO  of  the  Air  Transport  Association;  and  Frank  Miller,  Air-
port  Director,  Pensacola  Regional  Airport;  and  Deborah  McElroy, 
President of the Regional Airline Association. 

By  the  way,  I  got  an  e-mail  this  morning  from  my  regional  air-

line in Montana. They send you their regards. 

If  we  could  call  on  Dr.  Howard  Gruenspecht,  this  morning.  He 
is  the  Administrator  of  the  U.S.  Energy  Information  Administra-
tion. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

STATEMENT 

OF 

3

DR.  HOWARD 

K. 

GRUENSPECHT,
INFORMATION

DEPUTY  ADMINISTRATOR,  U.S.  ENERGY 
ADMINISTRATION 
Dr.  GRUENSPECHT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of 

the Committee. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  dis-
cuss  recent  developments  in  energy  markets  and  the  impacts  of 
Hurricane Katrina on jet fuel supply and prices. 

The  Energy  Information  Administration  is  the  independent  sta-
tistical and analytical agency within the Department of Energy. We 
do not promote, formulate or take positions on policy issues. 

As  we  all  know,  Hurricane  Katrina  has  wrought  incredible  dev-
astation  on  the  central  Gulf  Coast,  most  importantly  in  terms  of 
human  suffering,  but  also  in  terms  of  economic  impacts  that  have 
spread  well  beyond  the  stricken  area.  The  oil  and  gas  industry, 
with  many  facilities  in  the  direct  path  of  the  hurricane,  incurred 
significant  losses  in  production  and  processing  capacity,  of  which 
some  were  temporary,  but  others  will  continue  to  affect  output  for 
many months to come. 

As  Senator  McCain  alluded  to,  even  before  Hurricane  Katrina 
struck on August 29th, crude oil and petroleum prices were setting 
records.  On  August  26th,  the  near-month  price  of  crude  oil  on  the 
New  York  Mercantile  Exchange  closed  at  over  $66.00  per  barrel, 
which  was  $23.00  per  barrel  or  more  than  50  percent  higher  than 
a year earlier. 

Over  the  same  1-year  period,  retail  gasoline  prices  had  risen  74 
cents per gallon; retail diesel fuel prices 72 cents; and spot jet fuel 
prices  between  69  and  77  cents  per  gallon.  Oil  prices  worldwide 
have  been  rising  steadily  since  2002,  due  in  large  part  to  growth 
in  global  demand,  which  has  used  up  much  of  the  world’s  surplus 
production  capacity.  Refineries  have  been  running  at  increasingly 
high  levels  of  utilization  in  many  parts  of  the  world,  including  the 
United States. 

Hurricane Katrina shut down virtually all offshore oil production 
in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico,  along  with  eight  major  and  several  smaller 
refineries,  import  facilities,  including  the  Louisiana  Offshore  Oil 
Port,  and  several  major  crude  oil  and  petroleum  product  pipelines. 
At its peak impact, over 25 percent of U.S. crude oil production, 20 
percent of crude oil imports, and 10 percent of domestic refinery ca-
pacity was shut down. 

Many  of  these  facilities  have  since  restarted,  but  about  860,000 
barrels  per  day  of  crude  oil  production  remains  offline,  along  with 
four  major  refineries  with  a  total  distillation  capacity  of  880,000 
barrels  per  day.  At  their  historical  yield,  these  four  refineries 
produce,  approximately,  120,000  barrels  per  day  of  jet  fuel,  ac-
counting for 8 percent of total U.S. gas fuel production of about 1.6 
million barrels per day. Jet fuel consumption, measured as product 
supplied,  also  averages  about  1.6  million  barrels  per  day.  So  there 
is  a  relatively  close  balance  between  production  and  consumption 
of jet fuel in the United States. 

With  42  gallons  in  a  barrel,  a  50-cent-per-gallon  change  in  jet 
fuel  prices  translates  into  a  change  of  more  than  $30  million  in 
daily jet fuel expenditures for the Nation as a whole, not including 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

the  ameliorative  effects  of  hedging  and  long-term  contracts.  So, 
that is a pretty significant issue. 

In  the  immediate  aftermath  of  Hurricane  Katrina,  crude  oil 
prices  rose  briefly  to  over  $70.00  per  barrel,  up  more  than  $4.00 
in  less  than  48  hours,  but  in  less  than  a  week  had  fallen  below 
their pre-storm levels. The impact on crude oil prices was undoubt-
edly  lessened  by  the  relatively  robust  inventory  levels  before  the 
storm,  by  quick  assurance  that  refiners  unable  to  obtain  adequate 
crude would be able to borrow, by way of time exchanges, from the 
Strategic Petroleum Reserve, even before the coordinated release of 
stocks  by  the  United  States  and  other  members  of  the  Inter-
national Energy Agency was announced on September 2nd. 

The  more  significant  price  impact,  however,  was  on  finished  pe-
troleum products. Spot prices, the level at which large volumes are 
sold  by  refiners,  importers,  and  traders,  for  gasoline  rose  as  much 
as $1.40 a gallon east of the Rockies within 3 days, while spot die-
sel  fuel  prices  rose  35  to  40  cents,  and  spot  prices  for  jet  fuel  rose 
around  50  cents  a  gallon.  The  sudden  increase  in  product  prices 
was  the  primary  driver  of  an  increase  in  the  so-called  ‘‘crack 
spread,’’  defined  as  the  difference  between  the  petroleum  product 
price and the underlying price of crude oil. Crude oil prices did not 
change nearly as much as product prices did. 

The seemingly disproportionate change in finished product prices 
reflects  the  severity  and  expected  persistence  of  Katrina’s  impact 
on  refining  operations  in  the  Gulf.  Additionally,  the  shutdown  of 
the  Capline,  a  major  crude  oil  pipeline  from  Louisiana  to  the  Mid-
west, reduced crude supplies for refineries there, causing several to 
temporarily reduce operations. And there was also a temporary clo-
sure  of  Colonial  and  Plantation  pipelines  that  halted  the  distribu-
tion  of  products  from  the  Gulf  Coast  to  the  lower  East  Coast,  as 
far north as Baltimore, in the aftermath of Katrina. 

While  recent  movements  in  crack  spreads  were  heavily  influ-
enced by Hurricane Katrina, crack spreads were trending upwards 
well  before  the  storm  struck.  This  is  true  not  just  for  jet  fuel,  but 
for  other  petroleum  products.  As  U.S.  refineries  have  operated  in-
creasingly  close  to  full  capacity,  and  product  demand  continues  to 
rise, the balance of demand must increasingly be made up from im-
ports.  This,  in  turn,  requires  a  price  differential  between  the 
United  States  and  other  world  markets  to  attract  the  needed  im-
ports.  This  does  not  increase  the  cost  of  refining  products  in  the 
United States, but it does tend to increase the market value of fin-
ished petroleum products relative to crude oil. 

Wholesale petroleum product prices, like those of crude oil, have 
fallen  back  from  their  peak  levels,  and  as  of  yesterday,  were  near 
their  levels  before  Hurricane  Katrina.  Spot  prices  for  jet  fuel  have 
dropped by 54 cents per gallon on the Gulf Coast and 44 per gallon 
in  New  York  Harbor,  and  stand  about  1  cent  under  and  6  cents 
over, respectively, their levels on August 26, before Katrina struck. 
Other  petroleum  product  prices  have  shown  similar  trends;  al-
though  gasoline  prices  have  not  receded  as  much  as  prices  for  dis-
tillate products. 

Availability  was  another  issue  of  some  concern  in  the  wake  of 
Katrina. While there were rumors, or while there were reported ru-
mors,  of  imminent  outages  of  jet  fuel  at  certain  airports—I  think 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

you  will  hear  about  Pensacola—to  EIA’s  knowledge,  no  major  air-
ports actually ran out of jet fuel. 

Inventories are in reasonably good shape. They did decline in the 
week  after  Katrina.  We  are  going  to  release  more  inventory  data 
today  after  10:30.  So  if  the  questioning  goes  on,  I’ll  discuss  it,  but 
I cannot before then. 

The  near-term  outlook  for  oil  markets  depends  on  a  number  of 
factors, the rate at which refinery capacity affected by Katrina can 
be  brought  back  online  in  the  major  factor  affecting  petroleum 
product markets. Although full damage assessments for the four re-
fineries shut down have not yet been possible, early estimates indi-
cate that several of them may be down for several months. 

Even  if  things  are  fully  restored  by  December,  prices  for  all  pe-
troleum  products  are  likely  to  remain  elevated.  Last  week,  we  re-
leased our monthly Short-Term Energy Outlook. We looked at sev-
eral  cases,  fast  recovery,  slow  recovery,  and  medium  recovery.  In 
the  medium  recovery  scenario,  we  expect  the  average  price  for  re-
finery  sales  of  jet  fuel  to  be  about  $2.25  per  gallon  in  September, 
which is 32 cents above the August level. We do expect it to decline 
by  the  end  of  the  year  to  the  neighborhood  of  $2.10.  These  prices 
are significantly above the year ago levels. 

Again, we expect some of this Gulf Coast refining capacity to re-
main offline well into the fourth quarter, and we probably will have 
a need for greater imports of jet fuel in the remainder of 2005. 

That  concludes  my  statement,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 

your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Gruenspecht follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. HOWARD K. GRUENSPECHT, DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR, 

U.S. ENERGY INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
I appreciate the opportunity to appear before you today to discuss recent develop-
ments  in  energy  markets  and  the  impacts  of  Hurricane  Katrina  on  jet  fuel  supply 
and prices. 

The  Energy  Information  Administration  (EIA)  is  the  independent  statistical  and 
analytical  agency  in  the  Department  of  Energy.  We  do  not  promote,  formulate,  or 
take positions on policy issues. 

Hurricane  Katrina  has  wrought  incredible  devastation  on  the  central  Gulf  Coast, 
most  importantly  in  terms  of  human  suffering,  but  also  in  economic  impacts  that 
have spread well beyond the stricken area. The oil and gas industry, with many fa-
cilities  in  the  direct  path  of  the  hurricane,  incurred  significant  losses  in  production 
and processing capacity, of which some were temporary, but others will continue to 
affect output for many months to come. 

Even  before  Hurricane  Katrina  struck  on  August  29th,  crude  oil  and  petroleum 
product  prices  were  setting  records.  On  August  26,  the  near-month  price  of  crude 
oil on the New York Mercantile Exchange closed at over $66 per barrel, which was 
$23 per barrel, or more than 50 percent, higher than a year earlier. Over the same 
one-year period, retail gasoline prices had risen 74 cents per gallon, retail diesel fuel 
prices  72  cents,  and  spot  jet  fuel  prices  between  69  and  77  cents  per  gallon.  Oil 
prices  worldwide  had  been  rising  steadily  since  2002,  due  in  large  part  to  growth 
in global demand, which has used up much of the world’s surplus production capac-
ity.  Refineries  have  been  running  at  increasingly  high  levels  of  utilization  in  many 
parts of the world, including the United States. 

Hurricane  Katrina  shut  down  virtually  all  offshore  oil  production  in  the  Gulf  of 
Mexico,  along  with  eight  major  and  several  smaller  refineries,  import  facilities  in-
cluding the Louisiana Offshore Oil Port, and several major crude oil and petroleum 
product  pipelines.  At  its  peak  impact,  over  25  percent  of  U.S.  crude  oil  production, 
20  percent  of  crude  imports,  and  10  percent  of  domestic  refinery  capacity  was  shut 
down. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

Many  of  these  facilities  have  since  restarted,  but  about  860  thousand  barrels  per 
day  of  crude  oil  production  remains  offline,  along  with  four  major  refineries  with 
a  total  distillation  capacity  of  880  thousand  barrels  per  day.  At  their  historical 
yields, these four refineries produce approximately 120 thousand barrels per day of 
jet fuel, accounting for 8 percent of total U.S. jet fuel production of 1.6 million bar-
rels  per  day.  Jet  fuel  consumption,  measured  as  product  supplied,  also  averages 
about 1.6 million barrels per day, so there is a relatively close balance between pro-
duction  and  consumption.  With  42  gallons  in  a  barrel,  a  50-cent-per-gallon  change 
in  jet  fuel  prices  translates  into  a  change  of  roughly  $30  million  in  daily  jet  fuel 
expenditures  for  the  nation  as  a  whole,  not  considering  the  ameliorative  effects  of 
any hedges or long-term contract arrangements. 

In the immediate aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, with the extent of actual dam-
age still largely unknown, crude oil prices rose briefly over $70 per barrel, up more 
than  $4  in  less  than  48  hours,  but  in  less  than  a  week  had  fallen  below  their  pre-
storm  levels.  The  impact  on  crude  oil  prices  was  undoubtedly  lessened  by  the  rel-
atively robust inventory levels before the storm, and by quick assurance that refin-
ers  unable  to  obtain  adequate  crude  oil  supplies  would  be  able  to  borrow  by  way 
of  time  exchanges  from  the  Strategic  Petroleum  Reserve,  even  before  the  coordi-
nated release of stocks by the United States and other members of the International 
Energy Agency was announced on Friday, September 2. 

The  more  significant  price  impact,  however,  was  on  finished  petroleum  products. 
Spot  prices  (the  level  at  which  large  volumes  are  sold  by  refiners,  importers,  and 
traders)  for  gasoline  rose  as  much  as  $1.40  per  gallon  east  of  the  Rockies  within 
3 days, while spot diesel fuel prices rose 35 to 40 cents, and those for jet fuel around 
50  cents.  Even  prices  on  the  West  Coast  were  affected,  though  by  lesser  amounts. 
The sudden increase in product prices was the primary driver of an increase in the 
so-called ‘‘crack spread,’’ defined as the difference between a petroleum product price 
and the underlying price of crude oil. 

The  seemingly  disproportionate  change  in  finished  product  prices  reflects  the  se-
verity and expected persistence of Hurricane Katrina’s impact on refining operations 
in  the  Gulf.  Additionally,  the  shutdown  of  the  Capline,  a  major  crude  oil  pipeline 
from  Louisiana  to  the  Midwest,  reduced  crude  supplies  to  refineries  there,  causing 
several to temporarily reduce operations. Finally, the temporary closure of the Colo-
nial  and  Plantation  product  pipelines  virtually  halted  distribution  of  products  from 
the Gulf Coast to the lower East Coast, as far north as Baltimore, in the aftermath 
of Katrina. 

While  recent  movements  in  crack  spreads  were  heavily  influenced  by  the  effects 
of  Hurricane  Katrina,  crack  spreads  were  trending  upwards  well  before  the  storm 
struck. As U.S. refineries have operated increasingly close to full capacity, and prod-
uct demand continues to rise, the balance of demand must increasingly be made up 
from  imports.  This,  in  turn,  requires  a  sufficient  price  differential  between  the 
United States and other world markets to attract the needed imports. Although this 
does  not  increase  the  cost  of  refining  products  in  the  United  States,  it  does  tend  to 
increase the market value of finished petroleum products relative to crude oil. 

Wholesale petroleum product prices, like those of crude oil, have fallen back from 
their  peak  levels,  and  as  of  yesterday  (September  13)  were  near  their  levels  before 
Hurricane  Katrina.  Spot  prices  for  jet  fuel  have  dropped  by  54  cents  on  the  Gulf 
Coast and 44 cents in New York Harbor, and stand about 1 cent under and 6 cents 
over, respectively, their levels on August 26, before Hurricane Katrina. Other petro-
leum  product  prices  have  shown  similar  trends,  although  gasoline  prices  have  not 
receded as much as prices for distillate products. 

Availability  of  fuels  was  another  issue  of  some  concern  in  the  wake  of  Hurricane 
Katrina.  While  there  were  widely  reported  rumors  of  imminent  outages  of  jet  fuel 
at  certain  airports  in  the  days  following  Katrina,  to  EIA’s  knowledge,  no  airports 
actually ran out of fuel. 

Jet fuel inventories, which were in relatively good shape before the storm, did de-
cline,  but  have  remained  adequate  in  all  regions  so  far.  In  the  week  ending  Sep-
tember 2, U.S. total jet fuel inventories dropped by an estimated 1.6 million barrels, 
or  slightly  less  than  one  day’s  demand.  The  East  Coast,  the  region  most  affected 
due  to  the  pipeline  shutdowns  and  its  reliance  on  supplies  from  Gulf  Coast  refin-
eries, accounted for nearly 1.4 million barrels of the decline, equivalent to more than 
two days of demand in that region. It should be recognized that supplies of all petro-
leum  products,  including  jet  fuel,  will  remain  tight  in  the  coming  weeks,  and  pos-
sibly months, although increased imports may make up some of the overall product 
shortfall. 

While  the  near-term  outlook  for  oil  markets  depends  on  a  number  of  factors,  the 
rate  at  which  refinery  capacity  affected  by  Katrina  can  be  brought  back  on-line  is 
the major factor affecting petroleum product markets. Although full damage assess-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

ments for the four refineries remaining shut down have not yet been possible, early 
estimates indicate that several of them may be down for months. 

Even  if  the  energy  system  is  fully  or  near  fully  restored  by  December,  prices  for 
all  petroleum  products  are  likely  to  remain  elevated.  Last  Wednesday,  we  released 
our  monthly  Short-Term  Energy  Outlook.  For  this  Outlook,  we  considered  three 
cases based on the speed of recovery of the energy system from the effects of Hurri-
cane Katrina—Slow, Medium, and Fast Recovery scenarios. 

In  the  Medium  Recovery  scenario,  we  project  an  average  price  for  refiner  sales 
of jet fuel of roughly $2.25 per gallon in September, up about 32 cents from the Au-
gust  level,  which  declines  to  about  $2.10  per  gallon  by  December.  This  September 
price  would  be  about  94  cents  per  gallon  higher  than  the  same  month  a  year  ago, 
while  that  in  December  would  represent  a  year-to-year  increase  of  about  79  cents 
per gallon. 

In  line  with  the  impacts  seen  already  in  September,  and  a  significant  portion  of 
Gulf Coast refinery capacity expected to remain offline well into the fourth quarter, 
EIA’s  Short-Term  Energy  Outlook  also  reflects  our  expectation  for  lower  refinery 
production,  lower  inventories,  and  a  need  for  greater  imports  of  jet  fuel  in  the  re-
mainder of 2005. 

This concludes my statement, and I will be happy to answer your questions.

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. 
Now,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  James  May,  President  and  CEO  of 
Air  Transport  Association  Incorporated.  Thanks  for  coming  this 
morning, Jim. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, AIR 

TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr. MAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
For the airlines, the most immediate impacts from Katrina were 
reduced  fuel  supplies  as  you  have  heard;  some  airport  closures; 
and,  of  course,  dramatically  increased  fuels  prices.  Having  lost, 
roughly, 13 percent of refining capacity and the two major pipelines 
that  serve  the  East  Coast,  we  were  forced  to  manage  our  way 
through potential shortages in order to avoid service interruptions. 
Again,  this  is  something  you  have  heard  a  little  bit  about  already 
this morning. 

We,  basically,  tankered  extra  fuel  where  needed,  and  that  is  the 
process  of  loading  greater  amounts  of  fuel  in  the  airports  so  that 
we would not be drawing down at those most supply restricted air-
ports.  We  set  up  a  daily  conference  call  working  with  the  pipeline 
folks, the refiners, all the carriers, and other suppliers to the proc-
ess  so  that  we  could  identify  those  areas  where  we  had  problems, 
move  fuel  in.  And,  I  think  the  Federal  Government  did  a  good  job 
of  giving  us  some  waivers  on  the  Jones  Act.  IEA  had  an  oppor-
tunity to do some releases. 

We  moved  some  tankers  around,  and  while  supplies  are  tight  at 
some of the airports, I think we are well past that immediate crisis. 
We,  obviously,  were  impacted  by  airport  closures,  principally  Gulf-
port/Biloxi,  New  Orleans.  Service  in  the  region  has,  largely,  been 
restored with the exception of New Orleans, which has got commer-
cial service that kicked in yesterday on a limited basis, and I think 
we will begin to ramp up for a period of time. 

The  more  lasting  impact  from  Katrina,  however,  is  the  dramatic 
increase  in  the  price  of  jet  fuel,  which  has  been  talked  about  this 
morning. Unfortunately, it was already at record highs. Let me put 
it into perspective for you from the parochial side of the airlines in-
dustry.  In  January  2002,  the  price  of  jet  fuel  on  the  spot  market 
averaged  nearly  56  cents  a  gallon.  Shortly  before  Katrina,  that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

price  stood  at  $1.87  a  gallon,  and  today  spot  is  about  $1.92.  That 
was  yesterday’s  price.  That  is  a  243-percent  increase  over  4  years. 
Driving the price of jet fuel is the cost of crude oil, now hovering 
in the mid-$60s a barrel, and of the additional premium that refin-
ers  charge  to  produce  jet  fuel,  the  so-called  ‘‘crack  spread.’’  Now, 
this  premium  has  grown  dramatically  in  recent  years  and  it  ex-
ploded after Katrina. 

In  2002,  it  averaged  $3.63  a  barrel.  Shortly  after  Katrina,  it 

peaked at $30.00 a barrel. 

So, for all of 2005 we estimate that premium, that crack spread, 
will  exceed  $15.00,  a  400-plus  percent  increase  over  4  years.  Now, 
no business model at any airline can survive with sustained jet fuel 
prices in what amounts to a $90.00 to $100.00 per barrel range. 

The  future  is  not  bright.  Our  latest  forecast  shows  that  we  are 
going to pay $9.2 billion more for fuel in 2005 than we did in 2004, 
and  in  2005,  we  burned  roughly  19  billion  gallons  of  jet  fuel  and 
spent,  roughly,  $30.6  billion  for  that  fuel.  No  wonder  this  industry 
is  now  projecting  a  nearly  $10  billion  loss  for  2005  on  top  of  the 
$32.3 billion we have already recorded over the last 3 years. 

Now, to cope with this unprecedented situation, this industry has 
not  simply  sat  back.  We  have  taken  and  continue  to  take  aggres-
sive  measures  to  mitigate  fuel  consumption,  just  as  we  were  doing 
before  Katrina.  From  2001  to  2004  alone,  thanks  to  newer  fleets, 
single-engine  taxi,  lower  cruise  speeds,  onboard  weight  reduction, 
access  to  more  direct  ATC  routings,  and  a  host  of  other  measures, 
our  fuel  efficiency  jumped  nearly  20  percent,  and  it  has  tripled 
since 1971. 

We responded by sharply reducing or limiting control costs in our 
business;  revising  long-standing  collective  bargaining  agreements; 
streamlining operations; refining and, in some cases, even reducing 
hub  operations;  improving  employee  productivity;  and  overall  pro-
ductivity has risen a little less than 20 percent since the year 2000, 
up  almost  2.2  million  available  seat  miles  per  full-time  employee. 
We are parking less efficient airplanes. The big six passenger air-
lines  reduced  their  operating  fleets  by  over  500  aircraft  from  De-
cember  2000  to  present  and,  unfortunately,  these  efforts  have  re-
sulted in the loss of some 135,000 jobs in this industry alone. Now, 
for the same group, capital expenditures fell by $10 billion over the 
last 4 years. Likewise, unit operating costs, excluding fuel, fell from 
10.3 cents per available seat mile to 9.2 cents, a 6-plus percent im-
provement.  These  efforts,  truly,  have  been  nothing  short  of  aston-
ishing,  and  it  is  clear  that  if  not  for  the  price  we  must  pay  for  jet 
fuel,  the  airline  industry  would  be  profitable  today.  In  fact,  we  re-
main at the mercy of oil markets and the Federal Government. 

Gary  Chase  of  Lehman  Brothers  is  one  of  the  top  analysts  for 
this  industry  and  he  said,  and  I  quote,  ‘‘The  airline  industry  has 
moved  aggressively  to  reduce  costs  in  the  face  of  unprecedented 
challenges.  On  a  non-fuel  basis,  operating  profitability  is  as  good 
as  it  was  in  the  late  1990s.  Now,  while  these  facts  are  exciting, 
they  may  also  be  moot.  If  oil  prices  do  not  return  to  historic 
normals,  we  see  a  materially  greater  chance  for  oil  above  $50.00 
than  below  $40.00  for  the  next  several  years.  Unfortunately,  high 
fuel prices are consuming what would otherwise be an up cycle for 
this industry.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

Now,  it  must  also  be  recognized  that  at  the  end  of  the  day, 
Katrina’s impact is not limited to the airline industry. Every dollar 
increase in the price of a barrel of crude puts another 5,500 airline 
jobs at risk. This industry drives almost $1 trillion in economic ac-
tivity  here  in  the  United  States,  10  million  jobs.  Now,  unfortu-
nately, the harm to this industry caused by Katrina and continuing 
high  oil  prices  will  work  its  way  into  the  broader  economy,  and  in 
that  sense  we  are  somewhat  like  the  mine  and  the  canary  for  the 
economy. 

What, if anything, can be done to respond? As I said in my writ-
ten statement, we have a couple of suggestions. First, we hope that 
this  Congress  will  move  to  grant  a  1-year  holiday  from  what  was 
supposed  to  be  a  temporary  gas  tax  imposed  during  the  previous 
administration  in  1993.  That  tax  was  intended  to  be  dedicated  to 
deficit  reduction  that  was  later  moved  to  the  Airport  and  Airways 
Trust  Fund,  and  I  would  hope  the  Congress  will  favorably  enter-
tain suspending it for 1 year, while at the same time ensuring that 
the trust fund, the Aviation Trust Fund, remains whole. 

Second, I think we should find and produce more domestic oil in 
the  United  States,  including  reserves  from  the  Arctic  National 
Wildlife  Refuge,  and  the  outer  continental  shelf.  Other  environ-
mentally  concerned  nations  are  tapping  into  their  offshore  oil  and 
natural gas reserves. We must do the same if our aviation network, 
indeed  our  entire  transportation  system,  is  to  remain  sound  and 
competitive in the face of worldwide demand. 

Third, we must add refining capacity in the United States. In the 
long term, if we do not build new refineries and grow overall refin-
ing  capacity,  we  are  fated  to  suffer  even  higher  prices  for  refined 
product,  including,  home  heating  oil.  The  government  should  en-
courage  the  location  and  development  of  refineries  across  the 
United States, not just in the Gulf Coast region. 

And,  finally,  Congress  and  appropriate  federal  regulatory  bodies 
should  exercise  their  oversight  responsibilities  to  ensure  that  mar-
kets are driven by consumer demand and market forces, not specu-
lation.  Even  prior  to  the  run  up  of  oil  prices  after  Katrina,  there 
was  call  for  the  GAO  to  examine  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading 
Commission’s  oversight  of  domestic  petroleum  trading.  Consider-
ation  should  be  given  to  whether  or  not  the  measures  in  place  to 
limit the impact of speculative trading are adequate. Likewise, the 
dramatic  growth  in  the  premium  charge  for  refining  crude  into  jet 
fuel, the crack spread, merits review. 

Last,  I  would  like  to  take  a  moment  to  touch  on  the  industry’s 
support of relief efforts after the hurricane struck. In the days im-
mediately  following,  we  moved  into  the  New  Orleans  Airport  with 
an operation dubbed ‘‘Operation Air Care.’’ We moved some 13,000 
to 14,000 people over 130 flights, and what is important about that 
is  this  was  a  fully  volunteer  operation,  the  pilots,  the  crews.  We 
even  had  to  carry  our  own  mechanics  and  ground  crews  in,  and  it 
was a terrific effort. We were delighted to be part of it. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Katrina  serves  as  a  reminder  of  the  central  role 
that  this  industry  plays  not  only  in  our  economy,  but  society  at 
large.  If  our  nation  is  to  continue  to  grow  and  prosper,  the  impor-
tance  of  this  potent  capability  that  responded  so  well  in  a  time  of 
crisis must be recognized and served by rational policies that foster 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

economic well-being in growth in the airline industry. This country 
needs  a  stable  airline  industry  capable  of  providing  diverse  pas-
senger and cargo services in good times and bad. 

Taxes and fees imposed on the industry should be brought under 
control,  and  the  government  must  adopt  an  energy  policy  that  ex-
pands  this  country’s  oil  production  and  refining  capacity  while  re-
specting environmental concerns. 

Thank you for your attention. 
Senator BURNS. Thank you, Mr. May. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. May follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT AND CEO, AIR TRANSPORT 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  for  inviting  me  to  talk  about  the  effects  of  Hurricane 
Katrina  on  U.S.  air  carriers  and  their  employees.  The  Air  Transport  Association  is 
the  trade  association  for  the  leading  U.S.  airlines.  ATA  members  transport  more 
than 90 percent of all passenger and cargo traffic in the United States. 

Our nation has never experienced a natural disaster of the economic scope of Hur-
ricane  Katrina.  Hurricane  Camille  in  1969,  the  San  Francisco  earthquake  in  1989 
and  the  terrorist  attacks  of  four  years  ago  have  served  as  the  unfortunate  bench-
marks  of  devastation  in  recent  history . . . until  Katrina.  Beyond  the  human  suf-
fering and the loss of life and property, the common thread from each of these disas-
ters  is  the  ripple  effects  they  send  beyond  the  directly  affected  areas  and  into  the 
national and international economies. While terrorists targeted their attacks on gov-
ernmental  and  financial  centers  in  an  intentional  effort  to  destroy  our  way  of  life, 
Hurricane  Katrina,  a  random  act  of  nature,  will  have  a  similarly  disruptive  effect 
on  our  economy,  because  it  crippled  a  significant  portion  of  our  nation’s  energy  in-
frastructure.  Today  we  are  much  more  dependent  upon  oil  produced  from  the  Gulf 
of  Mexico  and  refined  in  Texas  and  Louisiana  than  we  were  in  1969  when  Camille 
struck.  And  even  small  disturbances  in  the  Gulf  can  have  measurable  impacts  on 
the prices that consumers pay for gasoline and airlines pay for jet fuel. 

Long before the devastation of Katrina, the airline industry was struggling under 
the  economic  and  societal  consequences  of  the  attacks  of  9/11,  the  resultant  growth 
in  federal  taxes  and  fees,  and,  of  course,  already  record-high  oil  prices.  Air  carriers 
are  always  among  the  sectors  of  the  economy  most  affected  by  the  soaring  price  of 
oil. While our members and the manufacturers of their aircraft have made remark-
able  gains  in  energy  efficiency,  it  has  proven  impossible  for  conservation  measures 
and  technology  to  outpace  the  growth  in  the  price  of  a  barrel  of  oil.  Unlike  many 
industries, we have no alternative fuel source. 

Anyone  who  follows  the  news  knows  that  even  before  Katrina  all  U.S.  airlines 
were  facing  an  extremely  challenging  commercial  and  policy  environment,  with  few 
signs of material improvement. Over the last four years, the industry—in total—has 
recorded  over  $32  billion  in  net  losses  (including  federal  reimbursements  for  the 
shutdown  and  a  portion  of  our  security  costs).  In  this  post-Katrina  economic  envi-
ronment of higher fuel prices and lost revenue from Gulf Coast tourism we are pro-
jecting  additional  losses  of  at  least  $9  billion  in  2005—up  from  earlier  projections 
of $5 to $7 billion. 

These  losses  have  led  us  to  borrow  huge  sums  to  survive,  with  few  assets  left  to 
pledge as collateral. For the nine largest airlines, including Southwest Airlines, net 
debt  stood  at  $81.3  billion  at  the  end  of  2004,  resulting  in  a  staggering  net  debt-
to-capital  ratio  of  110.1  percent.  Compare  this  to  $64.2  billion  and  71.7  percent  at 
the end of 2000. Eleven of the 12 passenger airlines rated by Standard & Poor’s are 
considered  ‘‘speculative’’  investments,  also  known  as  ‘‘junk  bond’’  quality.  Only 
Southwest Airlines is considered investment grade. 

Meanwhile,  fares  are  running  at  late  1980s  levels—a  fourth  of  all  domestic  pas-
sengers  now  pay  $200  or  less  including  taxes  for  a  roundtrip  ticket;  two-thirds  pay 
$300  or  less.  Airline  passenger  revenue  has  plummeted  from  its  historical  average 
of  0.95  percent  to  0.70  percent  of  U.S.  GDP—a  gap  of  $30  billion  based  on  today’s 
$11.7 trillion economy. 

Long  before  Katrina,  I  learned  that  just  when  you  think  it  can’t  get  any  worse 
it  does,  at  least  in  the  airline  business.  In  January  2001,  the  price  of  jet  fuel  on 
the  spot  markets  averaged  85.8  cents  per  gallon.  On  August  17,  as  Katrina  was 
building in the Gulf of Mexico, the price stood at $1.87. Today it is hovering around 
$2.05 per gallon, a 239 percent increase over four years. In 2004, the industry paid 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

$21.4  billion  for  jet  fuel.  That  tab  would  have  been  $5.5  billion  lower  at  2003  jet 
fuel prices and a whopping $8.0 billion lower at 2002 jet fuel prices. 

Moreover,  the  differential  between  what  refiners  pay  for  a  barrel  of  oil  and  what 
they  are  able  to  sell  the  same  amount  of  refined  product  has  grown  dramatically 
in  recent  years,  and  been  driven  higher  since  Katrina.  In  2002  this  refining  pre-
mium,  referred  to  as  the  ‘‘crack  spread’’  in  the  industry,  stood  at  an  average  of 
$3.63.  In  2003  it  rose  to  $5.90  and  then  to  $9.24  in  2004.  This  year  we  estimate 
a  12  month  average  in  excess  of  $15.00,  which  represents  a  414  percent  increase 
over four years. 

It  is  not  unreasonable  to  argue  that  without  the  doubling  of  oil  prices  over  the 
past three years the industry would not be in the economic crisis we find ourselves. 
But  the  future  doesn’t  look  any  brighter.  Our  forecast  shows  that  we  will  pay  $9.2 
billion  more  for  fuel  in  2005  than  in  2004.  If  these  projections  prove  accurate,  the 
industry  will  have  faced  a  103  percent  increase  in  its  fuel  costs  from  2001  ($14.8 
billion) to 2005 ($30.6 billion). When you understand that the industry has been hit 
with more than $30 billion in additional fuel costs and $15 billion in taxes, fees and 
unfunded  mandates  for  security  since  9/11,  and  compare  those  uncontrollable  costs 
to  the  $32  billion  the  industry  has  lost  over  that  period,  it  easy  to  see  where  the 
problems  lie.  No  industry  could  improve  its  efficiency  and  cut  its  costs  fast  enough 
to keep up with this kind of growth in their uncontrollable costs. 

On  Monday  of  this  week,  the  12-month  forward  curve  of  future  prices  stood  at 
$66.19 a barrel for crude oil and $1.98 per gallon of jet fuel ($83.16 per barrel). Now 
keep in mind that this industry consumed 18.6 billions gallons of jet fuel last year. 
That means that every penny increase in the price of a gallon increases our annual 
operating expenses by $186 million. Viewed from an employee perspective, every $1 
increase in the price of a barrel of crude puts another 5,500 airline jobs at risk. In-
deed,  the  airlines  have  shed  135,000  jobs  from  the  payrolls  since  August  2001. 
That’s a loss of one out of six employees and more cuts are likely. 

When people say to me, ‘‘But every time I fly the plane is full.’’ I respond, ‘‘They’re 
full,  alright.  Full  of  cheap  fares  and  expensive  fuel.’’  At  today’s  fares  and  jet  fuel 
prices,  the  average  breakeven  load  factor  for  the  industry  would  need  to  approach 
85  percent,  including  all  the  low-cost  carriers.  Compare  that  to  65  percent  in  the 
mid-90s. That means that every single flight on average must be at least 85 percent 
full of paying passengers to avoid losing money—not to make a fortune! 

So  how  are  we  coping?  First,  we  obviously  are  taking  all  possible  steps  to  reduce 
or  mitigate  fuel  consumption,  just  as  we  were  doing  before  Katrina.  From  2001  to 
2004  alone,  thanks  to  newer  fleets,  single-engine  taxi,  lower  cruise  speeds,  onboard 
weight  reduction,  access  to  more  ATC  lanes  in  the  sky,  and  a  host  of  other  meas-
ures, our fuel efficiency jumped 18 percent to 45 passenger miles per gallon. 

For  this  same  group,  capital  expenditures  fell  from  $13.1  billion  in  2000  to  $3.1 
billion in 2004 (up slightly from $2.7 billion in 2003), while unit operating costs ex-
cluding fuel fell 6.2 percent from 10.36 cents per available seat mile (ASM) in 2002 
to 9.72 cents per ASM in 2004. 

I think that’s pretty impressive. But you don’t have to believe me. As Gary Chase 

of Lehman Brothers observed on March 15:

‘‘The  airline  industry  has  moved  aggressively  to  reduce  costs  in  the  face  of  un-
precedented challenges . . . On a non-fuel basis, operating profitability . . . is 
as  good  as  it  was  in  the  late  1990s.  While  these  facts  are  exciting . . . ,  they 
may  also  be  totally  moot 
[historical 
norms] . . . [W]e see a materially greater chance for oil prices above $50 than 
below  $40  over  the  next  several  years.  Unfortunately,  high  fuel  prices  are  con-
suming what would otherwise be an upcycle for the industry.’’

if  oil  prices  do  not  return  to 

Let me reiterate this point, were it not for fuel costs the industry would be profit-

able. 

I’m often asked, ‘‘Why don’t your members just raise fares and pass through high 
oil  prices?’’  Well,  it’s  this  simple—if  we  could,  we  would.  To  cover  the  costs  of  fuel 
increases  from  2003  to  2004,  passengers  would  have  to  pay,  on  average,  an  addi-
tional  $28  per  ticket.  Yet  fares  during  this  period  continued  to  fall  because  of  the 
intensely competitive nature of the industry. Indeed, only recently have carriers had 
even  modest  successes  in  raising  fares  in  certain  markets.  These  fare  increases  are 
hardly enough to cover the cost of crude oil rising from $26 a barrel in 2002 to over 
$66  in  2005.  And  as  Standard  &  Poor’s  Phil  Baggaley  testified  before  the  House 
Aviation Subcommittee this last year:

‘‘Fuel represents a roughly comparable proportion of expenses for railroads and 
many  trucking  companies . . . ,  but  they  have  not  been  hurt  by  higher  fuel 
prices to nearly the same degree . . . Part of the difference is due to more ac-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

tive  hedging  programs  by  these  freight  transportation  companies,  but  most  is 
due  to  the  fact  that  many  of  their  contracts  with  corporate  customers  allow 
them to pass through higher fuel costs in the form of surcharges. Airlines have 
tried repeatedly to raise fares in response to high fuel costs, but with little suc-
cess. [T]he problem comes back to a lack of pricing power in a very competitive 
market.’’

The  unfortunate  truth  for  most  airlines  today  is  that  the  economic  principles  of 
supply  and  demand  still  apply.  If  we  could  raise  prices  to  cover  the  soaring  cost  of 
jet  fuel  or  the  many  new  taxes  and  fees  that  have  been  placed  on  the  industry  in 
recent  years  we  would.  But  what  many  of  our  customers  discovered  in  the  post-9/
11 world is that they don’t have to fly. Business travelers choose teleconferences or 
e-mail instead of a face-to-face meeting if they aren’t able to find a rock-bottom fare. 
Families  will  vacation  near  home  as  opposed  to  flying  to  Florida’s  beaches,  Colo-
rado’s ski slopes or grandma’s house. For short-haul flights, the addition of the TSA 
‘‘hassle  factor’’  has  made  taking  the  car  a  more  viable  option.  It’s  important  to  re-
member, airlines don’t just compete against each other. They compete against movie 
theaters, e-mail, video conferencing, automobiles, trains, corporate jets and even the 
local  amusement  park . . . anything  that  can  substitute  for  a  vacation  or  a  face-
to-face  sales  call.  The  loss  of  several  popular  vacation  destinations  along  the  Gulf 
Coast for the foreseeable future, including New Orleans, will only worsen this trend. 
So where does that leave U.S. air carriers? Frankly, we will remain at the mercy 
of  oil  markets  and  the  Federal  Government.  If  the  price  of  oil  stays  high  and  our 
taxes  along  with  it,  I  expect  more  jobs  lost,  more  flights  cut  and  more  airlines  in 
crisis.  In  the  international  arena,  our  global  competitiveness  will  continue  to  suffer 
because our airlines are paying disproportionately more than their foreign flag com-
petitors,  due  to  the  relative  weakness  of  the  dollar.  My  CEOs  will  continue  to  find 
ways  to  wring  costs  from  those  areas  they  can,  and  that  includes  further  fuel  con-
servation. But you can only be so efficient. As I said when I started, the airline in-
dustry  is  one  of  the  most  severely  hurt  by  the  soaring  price  of  oil.  Since  we  have 
no  other  options,  airplanes  will  be  burning  refined  oil  long  after  other  modes  of 
transportation have moved beyond it. Not because we want to but because the prin-
ciples of aircraft design rule out alternatives. 

So,  will  oil  stay  above  $60?  For  business  planning  purposes  it  is  prudent  to  as-
sume  that  it  will.  And  while  there  is  nothing  that  can  be  done  in  the  short  term 
to  reverse  the  continuing  damage  that  high  fuel  prices  are  having  on  the  industry, 
the  government  can  take  step  to  help—grant  a  one-year  holiday  from  the  4.3 
cents-per-gallon  jet  fuel  tax.  This  tax,  imposed  in  1993  was  intended  to  be  tem-
porary  and  dedicated  to  deficit  reduction.  It  was  later  redirected  into  the  Airport 
and  Airway  Trust  Fund,  but  remains  on  the  books  to  this  day  while  similar  taxes 
on other transportation have been repealed. 

For  the  medium  and  long  term,  the  solution  to  the  problem  is  to  do 
more . . . more  of  everything.  And  by  more  I  mean  more  conservation  and  more 
production—including  here  at  home.  I  am  proud  of  the  efficiency  gains  that  the 
aviation sector has made over the past 30 years. If other industries throughout the 
world  had  kept  pace,  we  would  not  face  nearly  the  crisis  we  face  today.  Yet  con-
servation  and  efficiency  are  only  part  of  the  equation.  We  must  find  and  produce 
more oil in the U.S. including from the Artic National Wildlife Refuge and the outer 
continental shelf. Other nations that many consider to be more environmentally con-
scious than the United States such as Norway, Great Britain and Japan are tapping 
into  their  off-shore  oil  and  natural  gas  reserves  for  both  national  security  and  eco-
nomic reasons. Yet in recent years, the United States has moved to expand restric-
tions  on  this  kind  of  energy  production,  including  in  the  recently  passed  ‘‘Energy 
Policy  Act  of  2005.’’  Our  nation  possesses  the  most  advanced  oil  production  tech-
nologies  in  the  world  and  these  areas  can  be  produced  in  an  environmentally  safe 
manner. In fact Hurricane Katrina proved how environmentally safe they are, since 
there  was  little  or  no  leakage  from  the  hundreds  of  off-shore  platforms  that  were 
in the path of the storm, including those that were knocked from their moorings and 
set adrift. 

Specifically,  the  administration  should  immediately  begin  the  process  of  leasing 
for  oil  production  in  the  remaining  area  of  the  eastern  Gulf  of  Mexico  known  as 
Lease  Sale  181.  Furthermore,  Congress  should  direct  that  revenues  derived  from 
these new leases be dedicated to Hurricane Katrina recovery and reconstruction ef-
forts. 

As I alluded to earlier, the rapid economic expansion in countries like China and 
India  will  demand  more  and  more  oil  and  keep  pushing  prices  higher.  The  ‘‘more 
of  everything’’  approach  can  work  there,  too.  The  United  States  should  encourage 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

those  nations  to  find  and  produce  more  of  their  own  energy  as  well  as  help  them 
use it more efficiently by providing them with technologies to reduce waste. 

More  of  everything  also  means  that  as  a  nation  we  must  be  willing  to  build  new 
refineries. I know that this issue is outside of this Committee’s jurisdiction, but our 
nation’s stagnant refining capacity has created a bottleneck in the distribution chain 
that  further  increases  prices,  as  noted  above.  Hurricane  Katrina  immediately 
knocked  out  19  percent  of  U.S.  oil  refining  capacity  and  13  percent  of  our  jet  fuel 
refining.  Had  Katrina  made  landfall  further  west,  the  toll  on  the  refiners  would 
have  been  even  greater  and  fuel  prices  would  likely  be  even  higher.  While  in  the 
short term it is critical for our economy that these refineries be restored to full oper-
ational  capacity  as  quickly  as  possible,  in  the  longer  term,  if  we  do  not  begin  to 
build  new  refineries  and  grow  overall  refining  capacity  I  fear  that  we  are  fated  to 
suffer even higher prices. 

New  refineries,  just  like  new  oil  production,  should  not  be  concentrated  in  one 
place,  leaving  them  unnecessarily  vulnerable  to  natural  disasters  and  terrorist  at-
tacks.  We  now  know  the  price  we  can  pay  for  putting  so  many  of  our  energy  eggs 
into one basket—the Gulf Coast region. 

Also,  I  encourage  Congress  and  the  Administration  to  ensure  that  forces  are  not 
working  within  western  energy  markets  to  unnaturally  inflate  prices.  There  are 
simply  too  many  unnatural  influences  in  global  oil  markets  to  allow  market  specu-
lators  to  contribute  to  the  problem.  I  encourage  Congress  and  the  appropriate  fed-
eral regulatory bodies to exercise their oversight responsibilities to ensure that mar-
kets are driven by consumer demand and not speculation. Even prior to the run up 
of oil prices after Katrina, there were calls for the Government Accountability Office 
(GAO)  to  examine  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission’s  (CFTC)  oversight 
of domestic petroleum trading. I believe this to be even more appropriate today. 

Some  have  attacked  the  airline  industry  for  not  being  fast  enough  to  adapt  to 
market  changes.  I  strongly  disagree  with  this  view  and  point  the  past  three  years 
of aggressive cost-saving moves taken by all airlines to stay competitive. I also point 
to  the  past  30  years  of  aggressive  efforts  by  the  industry  to  save  fuel  and  improve 
efficiency. We have been and will continue to be leaders in each of these areas. 

In  regard  to  the  hurricane’s  impact  on  airport  infrastructure  and  the  National 
Airspace  System,  airports  in  areas  affected  by  Hurricane  Katrina  have  recovered 
relatively  quickly  from  an  operational  perspective.  There  were  varying  degrees  of 
damage to both airport facilities and Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) naviga-
tional  aids,  but  in  general,  airports  with  commercial  service  are  fully  operational. 
New  Orleans  International  Airport  (MSY)  in  particular,  suffered  some  significant 
damage to the airport roof and adjacent facilities, but temporary measures have en-
abled  the  restoration  of  commercial  service  on  September  13.  All  other  commercial 
airports in the region are fully operational. 

Since I have talked to you about the impacts of the hurricane on the airlines, I’d 
now  like  to  tell  you  of  the  impact  the  industry  has  had  on  the  relief  and  recovery 
operation. In the days immediately following the disaster, ATA and its member air-
lines  conducted  an  airlift  of  Hurricane  Katrina  victims  out  of  New  Orleans  to  mul-
tiple  evacuee  sites  around  the  nation.  Known  as  ‘‘Operation  Air  Care,’’  ATA  coordi-
nated  the  scheduling  of  the  aircraft  and  crews  contributed  to  this  vital  effort.  Over 
a  six-day  period  beginning  August  30,  ‘‘Operation  Air  Care’’  evacuated  more  than 
13,000  people  on  more  than  130  flights  to  at  least  nine  locations.  I  would  like  to 
make  clear  that  this  effort  was  industry-wide,  including  carriers  that  currently  are 
operating in bankruptcy, and many flight crews that volunteered their time to help 
out. I have never been so proud of our industry and our employees. 

In  addition  to  stepping  up  to  help  in  the  relief  efforts  in  the  days  after  Katrina 
hit,  the  airlines  also  were  focused  on  ensuring  that  there  was  sufficient  jet  fuel 
available at all commercial service airports to allow for uninterrupted service. With 
13  percent  of  jet  fuel  refining  capacity  shut  down  and  the  two  major  pipelines  that 
serve  the  East  Coast  out  of  commission,  swift  action  was  required  on  the  part  of 
airlines  and  fuel  suppliers.  This  allowed  for  the  industry  to  quickly  identify  which 
airports  faced  potential  jet  fuel  shortages  and  to  take  measures  to  prevent  service 
interruptions,  including  disruptions  to  relief  flights.  The  airlines,  out  of  necessity, 
had to take the Draconian measure of ‘‘tankering’’ fuel, which simply means placing 
extra  fuel  on  planes  going  into  those  airports  identified  as  facing  shortages.  This 
Hobson’s  choice  successfully  prevented  those  ‘‘at  risk’’  airports  from  running  out  of 
fuel  but  resulted  in  those  airplanes  flying  with  greater  onboard  weight,  which  in-
creased fuel consumption, i.e., burning more fuel to get fuel where fuel was needed. 
Of  course,  carrying  this  extra  fuel  displaced  revenue  generating  payloads  such  as 
cargo and passengers, making this stop-gap measure extremely expensive. 

This  effort  also  necessitated  close  monitoring  of  those  airports  from  where  we 
were drawing fuel, so as not to create shortages there. This was a first-stage crisis-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

control  measure  that  allowed  us  to  meet  our  schedules  and  keep  our  commitments 
to  our  customers.  Unfortunately,  with  jet  fuel  prices  hitting  record  highs  at  the 
same  time,  it  came  at  an  incredible  cost.  As  we  return  to  our  normal  operations, 
we  continue  to  face  jet  fuel  prices  that  were  incomprehensible  only  a  few  months 
ago, and unexpected fuel bills for our efforts to keep the system running during the 
past two weeks. 

As  I  look  back  at  ‘‘Operation  Air  Care,’’  I  hope  that  it  serves  as  a  reminder  of 
the central role that the airline industry plays—not only in our economy but within 
our  society.  Using  the  same  people  and  machines  that  allow  for  our  ‘‘just-in-time’’ 
economy to function, that bring buyers and sellers together, and that reunite grand-
parents  with  grandchildren,  air  carriers  were  able  to  bring  much  needed  bottled 
water  and  relief  workers  in,  and  get  evacuees  out.  This  massively  potent  capability 
that served the devastated Gulf Coast areas so well serves an important role every 
day  as  the  economic  and  transportation  engine  that  quickly  connects  the  expanses 
of our nation to each other and the rest of the world. 

To  conclude,  for  the  airlines  the  saying  ‘‘It  is  always  darkest  before  the  storm’’ 
is reversed. We now face an even darker period than we did before Katrina brought 
her  160  mile-per-hour  winds  and  flood  waters  to  the  Gulf  Coast.  Even  higher  fuel 
prices and the loss of tourism to the impacted areas were, not nor could have, been 
planned  for.  Let  me  be  very  clear  about  this.  No  business  model  at  any  airline  can 
sustain such a rapid increase in fuel prices. 

So,  in  the  immediate  term,  repeal  of  the  4.3  cents-per-gallon  tax  on  commercial 
aviation  fuel  will  help  protect  airline  jobs,  sustain  service  to  smaller  communities, 
foster  competition  that  benefits  consumers  and  allow  for  this  industry,  which  is  so 
critical to the health of our economy, to begin its recovery. 

In  the  longer  term  we  must  take  the  lessons  learned  from  Katrina  and  diversify 
our  nation’s  oil  production  and  refining  so  that  no  single  natural  or  man-made  dis-
aster  can  have  such  a  broadreaching  impact  of  our  vital  energy  infrastructure.  If 
we  do  not,  prices  are  certain  to  continue  to  climb  and  the  record-high  gasoline  and 
jet  fuel  prices  we  see  today  will  be  remembered  fondly  by  consumers  and  airlines 
as the ‘‘good old days,’’ rather than the darkness after the storm. 

Thank you.

Senator  BURNS.  Now,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Frank  Miller,  Air-
port  Director  at  Pensacola  Regional  Airport  of  which  Senator 
McCain is, probably, pretty familiar. 

STATEMENT OF FRANK MILLER, AIRPORT DIRECTOR, 

PENSACOLA REGIONAL AIRPORT 

Mr.  MILLER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Pensacola  Regional  Air-
port  is  a  small  hub  airport  with  1.6  million  total  passengers  and 
with  a  staffing  level  of  50  employees.  On  September  16,  2004, 
we——

Senator BURNS. Is your microphone on? Push the button. 
Mr. MILLER. I am sorry. 
Pensacola  Airport  is  a  small  hub  airport  with  1.6  million  total 
passengers  and  with  a  staffing  level  of  50  employees.  On  Sep-
tember  16,  2004,  we  were  in  the  path  of  Hurricane  Ivan,  one  of 
four  hurricanes  to  strike  the  State  of  Florida  in  a  6-week  period. 
Pensacola Regional Airport closed its airfield on Wednesday, Sep-
tember 15th, at 3:30 p.m. due to tropical force winds coming in ad-
vance  of  Hurricane  Ivan,  a  Category  III  hurricane.  The  hurricane 
made  landfall  in  the  early  morning  hours  of  September  16,  with 
130  mile-per-hour  sustained  winds.  As  the  hurricane  force  winds 
subsided  in  the  midmorning  hours  of  September  16th,  airport  per-
sonnel  inspected  the  airfield  operating  environment,  made  repairs, 
and  by  12:45  p.m.  reopened  the  airfield  for  emergency  relief  air-
craft  only.  Roads  and  highways  leading  into  Escambia  and  Santa 
Rosa  Counties  were  impassable  due  to  fallen  trees,  debris,  and 
damaged  bridges.  In  response  to  this,  Pensacola  Regional  Airport 
was designated as the primary staging area for disaster relief sup-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

plies,  filling  this  role  for  the  first  4  days  of  disaster  relief  oper-
ations. 

During  these  4  days,  a  mixture  of  C–17  and  C–130  military  air-
craft  began  major  relief  operations,  and  24  various  civilian  and 
military  helicopters  conducted  numerous  missions  from  the  airport 
on  an  around-the-clock  basis.  With  temporary  flight  rules  in  place 
over  the  airport,  Pensacola  Regional  Airport  operations  personnel 
assumed  control  of  the  airfield  and  issued  219  aircraft  landing  au-
thorizations. 

Consumable  materials,  such  as  unleaded  and  diesel  fuels,  were 
a  critical  component  for  recovery  vehicles  and  equipment,  but  due 
to  the  airport’s  limited  storage  capacity  at  the  fuel  farm,  the  air-
port  quickly  became  dependent  on  outside  suppliers  after  exhaust-
ing its internal reserves. This put us in direct competition with all 
the other requesting agencies working through the local emergency 
operations center. 

Competing  with  these  other  agencies  for  a  finite  supply  of  fuel 
was challenging, given the continuous need for fuel to support elec-
trical  generators  for  the  airfield  and  buildings,  for  tenant-operated 
aircraft  servicing  equipment,  and  personal  vehicles  for  key  per-
sonnel  such  as  police  officers,  operations  and  maintenance  per-
sonnel,  and  air  traffic  controllers  to  ensure  their  ability  to  get  to 
and from the airport. 

Seven  airports  in  the  southeast  United  States  sent  27  airport-
trained  personnel  to  provide  immediate  assistance  to  Pensacola. 
The personnel were electricians, HVAC technicians, building main-
tenance technicians, airfield operations personnel, dispatchers, law 
enforcement  officers,  and  fire  fighters.  The  amount  of  time  these 
personnel  stayed  in  Pensacola  varied,  but  one  team  stayed  for  a 
full 7 days. 

Hurricane  Ivan  disrupted  commercial  power  and  water  to  the 
airport  for  a  total  of  8  days.  Nearby  hotels  that  were  open  were 
filled  up  to  capacity  with  displaced  Pensacola  residents.  Imme-
diately  following  the  hurricane,  there  was  an  ongoing  demand  to 
provide  a  safe  and  sanitary  off-duty  environment  for  the  response 
teams for sleeping, showering, and eating. 

The airport has an integral role in the recovery of a community, 
providing  the  airfield  infrastructure  to  support  airlift  relief  oper-
ations.  Hurricane  Ivan’s  toll  on  Pensacola  Regional  Airport  made 
it  apparent  that  airports  affected  by  hurricanes  would  be  depend-
ent upon assistance from other airports for personnel, supplies, and 
building  materials  to  recover  and  begin  commercial  operations. 
Community-wide  disaster  relief  efforts  made  it  difficult,  if  not  im-
possible,  to  rely  upon  local  assistance.  Any  local  assistance  would 
not  be  airport-knowledgeable  and  unable  to  work  independently  of 
local airport personnel. 

Initiated  by  the  Savannah/Hilton  Head  International  Airport,  a 
mutual  aid  network  is  being  established  that  recognizes  the  need 
for  other  airports  to  provide  disaster  relief  to  affected  airports  and 
thereby  minimize  the  time  to  resume  commercial  operations.  Pen-
sacola’s  experience  with  Hurricane  Ivan  also  highlighted  the  need 
for  a  single  outside  point  of  contact  or  a  clearinghouse  for  assist-
ance. This clearinghouse coordinates the assistance to the damaged 
airport  and  thereby  relieves  the  affected  airport  personnel  from 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

taking  numerous  phone  calls  offering  assistance,  and  to  assure  re-
lief efforts were coordinated and controlled. 

16

Savannah/Hilton Head International Airport accepted the role as 
the  clearinghouse,  to  receive  requests  for  aid  and  to  disseminate 
those requests to the airports in the mutual aid network. 

Although  not  fully  established  when  Hurricane  Katrina  hit  the 
Gulf  Coast,  the  Southeast  Airports  Disaster  Alliance  Group  initi-
ated  its  relief  efforts  with  Savannah/Hilton  Head  providing  the 
agreed  upon  clearinghouse  services.  As  the  relief  efforts  evolved, 
Pensacola  Regional  Airport,  as  the  closest  fully  operational  airport 
to  Gulfport/Biloxi,  became  the  logistical  hub  for  the  airport  re-
sponse teams going into Mississippi. We provided final briefings for 
navigating anticipated road detours, topped off fuel tanks, procured 
and  loaded  additional  supplies,  and  coordinated  housing  with  local 
hotels for rotating teams. Similar activities were occurring in Hous-
ton for aid to the New Orleans Airport. 

The  first  lesson  learned  with  Hurricane  Katrina:  One  airport 
must  serve  as  the  clearinghouse  to  coordinate  mutual  aid  assist-
ance,  while  a  second  airport  becomes  the  logistical  hub  for  the  re-
sponse  teams.  During  the  first  2  weeks  following  Hurricane 
Katrina,  the  Airports  Disaster  Alliance  Group  has  worked  through 
a  learning  curve  as  it  provides  relief  assistance  to  Gulfport/Biloxi. 
Lessons learned: The airport clearinghouse needs a direct FEMA 
point  of  contact.  This  point  of  contact  must  be  identified  72  hours 
prior  to  the  forecasted  landfall  and  be  available  immediately  after 
the  storm  to  work  with  the  clearinghouse  to  provide  mission  num-
bers for each airport sending response teams into the affected area. 
Mission numbers are critical to ensure teams are able to access the 
affected area through any ground checkpoints that may be present, 
to  ensure  aircraft  can  transit  the  Temporary  Flight  Rule,  TFR, 
area  established  over  the  airport,  and  to  ensure  reimbursement 
protocols  are  established  for  the  costs  incurred  by  the  responding 
airports. 

During  the  Gulfport/Biloxi  relief  effort,  airports  were  delayed 
while awaiting official calls for assistance. The Gulfport/Biloxi Air-
port Director was required to contact his state EOC to request sup-
port  from  a  particular  airport.  His  state  EOC  then  called  the  re-
sponding airports’ state EOC to officially initiate the request for as-
sistance. 

FEMA  can  and  should  intervene  to  make  direct  requests  to  the 
airport  clearinghouse,  initiating  specific  relief  requests  without 
going through multiple state contacts, and providing the necessary 
mission  numbers  at  the  time  of  the  request.  Hurricane  response 
equipment  and  supplies  generic  to  any  storm  event  should  be  pur-
chased  and  stored  in  trucks  at  a  location  in  the  southeast  U.S., 
ready  and  available  to  be  dispatched  immediately  after  a  storm. 
These trucks should be dispatched and report to the nearest airport 
identified as the logistical support airport and which shall serve as 
the base for responding teams. An ongoing FEMA presence at this 
airport  would  serve  as  the  facilitator  for  the  airport  relief  efforts. 
Examples  of  supplies  to  be  stored  in  these  trucks  would  include 
emergency  generators,  water,  MREs,  satellite  telephones,  and 
building  supplies.  Temporary  housing  for  the  responding  teams  is 
needed  to  provide  the  safe  and  sanitary  off-duty  living  environ-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

ment. Response teams cannot rely on the availability of local hous-
ing.  Trailers  capable  of  housing  five  to  seven  people  with  an  inde-
pendent water supply should be stored at the same location as the 
relief  supplies  and  trucks  and  be  a  part  of  the  supplies  and  equip-
ment sent into the area for airport relief efforts. 

As  the  Airports  Disaster  Alliance  Group  evolves,  it  is  clear  that 
we have the technical expertise to provide onsite and immediate re-
lief that will help an airport recover and resume operations, but it 
is also clear that our efforts require Federal support to provide the 
necessary  coordination  with  state  and  local  relief  efforts,  and  to 
provide the necessary supplies, equipment, and materials necessary 
to conduct disaster relief operations. Thank you for the opportunity 
to speak this morning. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Miller follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRANK MILLER, AIRPORT DIRECTOR, PENSACOLA REGIONAL 

AIRPORT 

Pensacola  Regional  Airport  is  a  small  hub  airport  with  1.6  million  total  pas-
sengers and with a staffing level of 50 employees. On September 16, 2004, we were 
in  the  path  of  Hurricane  Ivan,  one  of  4  hurricanes  to  strike  the  State  of  Florida  in 
a six week period. 

Pensacola  Regional  Airport  closed  its  airfield  on  Wednesday,  September  15th,  at 
3:30  p.m.  due  to  tropical  force  winds  coming  in  advance  of  Hurricane  Ivan,  a  Cat-
egory III hurricane. The hurricane made landfall in the early morning hours of Sep-
tember  16,  2004  with  130  mph  sustained  winds.  As  the  hurricane-force  winds  sub-
sided  in  the  mid-morning  hours  of  September  16th  airport  personnel  inspected  the 
airfield  operating  environment,  made  repairs,  and  by  12:45  p.m.  re-opened  the  air-
field  for  emergency  relief  aircraft  only.  Roads  and  highways  leading  into  Escambia 
and  Santa  Rosa  counties  were  impassable  due  to  fallen  trees,  debris  and  damaged 
bridges;  in  response  to  this  Pensacola  Regional  Airport  was  designated  as  the  pri-
mary  staging  area  for  disaster  relief  supplies,  filling  this  role  for  the  first  4  days 
of disaster relief operations. 

During  these  four  days  a  mixture  of  C–17  and  C–130  military  aircraft  began 
major  relief  operations,  and  24  various  civilian  and  military  helicopters  conducted 
numerous  missions  from  the  airport  on  an  around-the-clock  basis.  With  temporary 
flight  rules  in  place  over  the  airport,  Pensacola  Regional  Airport  operations  per-
sonnel  assumed  control  of  the  airfield  and  issued  219  aircraft  landing  authoriza-
tions. 

Consumable  materials  such  as  unleaded  and  diesel  fuels  were  a  critical  compo-
nent  for  recovery  vehicles  and  equipment  but  due  to  the  airport’s  limited  storage 
capacity at the fuel farm, the airport quickly became dependent on outside suppliers 
after exhausting its internal reserves. This put us in direct competition with all the 
other  requesting  agencies  working  through  the  local  emergency  operations  center. 
Competing  with  these  other  agencies  for  a  finite  supply  of  fuel  was  challenging 
given  the  continuous  need  for  fuel  to  support  electrical  generators  for  the  airfield 
and  buildings,  tenant-operated  aircraft  servicing  equipment,  and  personal  vehicles 
of key personnel such as police officers, operations and maintenance personnel, and 
air traffic controllers to ensure their ability to get to and from the airport. 

Seven  airports  in  the  southeast  sent  27  airport-trained  personnel  to  provide  im-
mediate  assistance  to  Pensacola.  The  personnel  were  electricians,  HVAC  techni-
cians,  building  maintenance  technicians,  airfield  operations  personnel,  dispatchers, 
law  enforcement  officers  and  fire  fighters.  The  amount  of  time  these  personnel 
stayed in Pensacola varied, but one team stayed in Pensacola for a full week. Hurri-
cane Ivan disrupted commercial power and water to the airport for a total of 8 days; 
nearby  hotels  that  were  habitable  were  filled  to  capacity  with  displaced  Pensacola 
residents.  Immediately  following  the  hurricane,  there  was  an  on-going  demand  to 
provide  a  safe  and  sanitary  off-duty  environment  for  the  response  teams  for  sleep-
ing, showering and eating. 

The airport has an integral role in the recovery of a community, providing the air-
field infrastructure to support airlift relief operations. Hurricane Ivan’s toll on Pen-
sacola Regional Airport made it apparent that airports affected by hurricanes would 
be dependent upon assistance from other airports for personnel, supplies and build-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

ing materials to recover and begin commercial operations. Community-wide disaster 
relief  efforts  made  it  difficult,  if  not  impossible,  to  rely  upon  local  assistance.  Any 
local  assistance  would  not  be  airport-knowledgeable  and  unable  to  work  independ-
ently of local airport personnel. 

Initiated  by  the  Savannah/Hilton  International  Airport,  a  mutual  aid  network  is 
being  established  that  recognizes  the  need  for  other  airports  to  provide  disaster  re-
lief  to  affected  airports  and  thereby  minimize  the  time  to  resume  commercial  oper-
ations.  Pensacola’s  experience  with  Hurricane  Ivan  also  highlighted  the  need  for  a 
single  outside  point  of  contact  or  a  clearinghouse  for  assistance.  This  clearinghouse 
coordinates  the  assistance  to  the  damaged  airport  and  thereby  relieves  the  affected 
airport personnel from taking numerous calls offering assistance and to assure relief 
efforts were coordinated and controlled. 

Savannah/Hilton  Head  International  Airport  accepted  the  role  as  the  clearing-
house,  to  receive  requests  for  aid  and  to  disseminate  those  requests  to  the  airports 
in the mutual aid network. 

Although  not  fully  established  when  Hurricane  Katrina  hit  the  Gulf  Coast,  the 
Southeast  Airports  Disaster  Alliance  Group  initiated  its  relief  efforts  with  Savan-
nah/Hilton Head providing the agreed upon clearinghouse services. As the relief ef-
forts  evolved  Pensacola  Regional  Airport,  as  the  closest  fully  operational  airport  to 
Gulfport/Biloxi,  became  the  logistical  hub  for  the  airport  response  teams  going  into 
Mississippi.  We  provided  final  briefings  for  navigating  anticipated  road  detours, 
topped  off  fuel  tanks,  procured  and  loaded  additional  supplies,  and  coordinated 
housing  with  local  hotels  for  rotating  teams.  Similar  activities  were  occurring  in 
Houston for aid to the New Orleans airport. 

The  first  lesson  learned  with  Hurricane  Katrina:  One  airport  must  serve  as  the 
clearinghouse  to  coordinate  mutual  aid  assistance  while  a  second  airport  becomes 
the logistical hub for the response teams. 

During the first two weeks following Hurricane Katrina the Airports Disaster Alli-
ance  Group  has  worked  through  a  learning  curve  as  it  provides  relief  assistance  to 
Gulfport/Biloxi. Lessons learned:

• The  airport  clearinghouse  needs  a  direct  FEMA  point  of  contact.  This  point  of 
contact must be identified 72 hours prior to the forecasted landfall and be avail-
able immediately after the storm to work with the clearinghouse to provide mis-
sion  numbers  for  each  airport  sending  response  teams  into  the  affected  area. 
Mission  numbers  are  critical  to  ensure  teams  are  able  to  access  the  affected 
area  through  any  ground  checkpoints  that  may  be  present,  to  ensure  aircraft 
can transit the Temporary Flight Rule (TFR) area established over the airport, 
and to ensure reimbursement protocols are established for the costs incurred by 
the responding airports.

• During the Gulfport/Biloxi relief effort airports were delayed while awaiting the 
official calls for assistance. The Gulfport/Biloxi Airport Director was required to 
contact  his  state  EOC  to  request  support  from  a  particular  airport;  his  state 
EOC then called the responding airport’s state EOC to officially initiate the re-
quest  for  assistance.  FEMA  can  and  should  intervene  to  make  direct  requests 
to  the  airport  clearinghouse,  initiating  specific  relief  requests  without  going 
through  multiple  state  contacts,  and  providing  the  necessary  mission  numbers 
at the time of the request.

• Hurricane  response  equipment  and  supplies  generic  to  any  storm  event  should 
be purchased and stored in trucks at a location in the southeast U.S., ready and 
available  to  be  dispatched  immediately  after  a  storm.  These  trucks  should  be 
dispatched  and  report  to  the  nearest  airport  identified  as  the  logistical  support 
airport  and  which  shall  serve  as  the  base  for  responding  teams.  An  on-going 
FEMA presence at this airport would serve as the facilitator for the airport re-
lief efforts. Examples of supplies to be stored in these trucks include emergency 
generators, water, MREs, satellite telephones, and building supplies.

• Temporary  housing  for  the  responding  teams  is  needed  to  provide  the  safe  and 
sanitary  off-duty  living  environment.  Response  teams  cannot  rely  on  the  avail-
ability  of  local  housing.  Trailers  capable  of  housing  5–7  people  with  an  inde-
pendent  water  supply  should  be  stored  at  the  same  location  as  the  relief  sup-
plies and trucks and be a part of the supplies and equipment sent into the area 
for airport relief effort.

As the Airports Disaster Alliance Group evolves it is clear that we have the tech-
nical  expertise  to  provide  on-site  and  immediate  relief  that  will  help  an  airport  re-
cover and resume operations; but it is also clear that our efforts require federal sup-
port  to  provide  the  necessary  coordination  with  state  and  local  relief  efforts,  and  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

provide  the  necessary  supplies,  equipment  and  materials  necessary  to  conduct  dis-
aster relief operations. 

Thank you for the opportunity to speak this morning.

Senator  BURNS.  And  now  we  will  hear  from  Ms.  Deborah 
McElroy,  President,  Regional  Airline  Association.  Thank  you  for 
coming this morning. 

STATEMENT OF DEBORAH C. MCELROY, PRESIDENT, 

REGIONAL AIRLINE ASSOCIATION 

Ms.  MCELROY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  will  begin  by  briefly  giving  some  information  about  the 
Regional  Airline  Industry.  These  carriers  use  9  to  108  seat  air-
planes, and last year they transported one out of every five domes-
tic  passengers.  We  serve  655  of  the  664  airports  in  the  United 
States  with  scheduled  commercial  service.  At  479  or  72  percent  of 
these  communities,  regional  airlines  provide  the  only  source  of 
scheduled air transportation. Of those communities, 99 in the lower 
48  States,  as  well  as  3  in  Hawaii  and  33  in  Alaska,  receive  sub-
sidized air service through the Essential Air Service Program, EAS. 
The  majority  of  regional  airline  service  is  provided  in  partnership 
with the major carriers under co-sharing agreements. 

In  2004,  99  percent  of  135  million  passengers  transported  by  re-
gional  airlines  traveled  on  co-sharing  airlines.  These  partnership 
agreements, which provide benefits for passengers and the airlines, 
have  two  broad  methods  of  revenue  sharing.  The  first,  prevalent 
among larger regional carriers operating regional jets, occurs when 
a major and a regional carrier enter into a fee for departure, or ca-
pacity  buy  agreement,  where  the  major  fully  compensates  the  re-
gional airline at a predetermined rate for flying a specific schedule. 
The  second  arrangement,  common  to  smaller,  turboprop  opera-
tors,  occurs  when  the  major  pays  a  portion  of  the  passenger  ticket 
revenue.  This  is  referred  to  as  ‘‘pro-rate’’  or  ‘‘shared  revenue’’  fly-
ing. 

While  regional  airlines  with  pro-rate  agreements  are  most  vul-
nerable to cost increases and the recent fuel cost crisis, it is impor-
tant  to  note  that  the  fee  for  departure  carriers  also  suffer  when 
fuel costs increase this dramatically. Even if the regional airline is 
fully  compensated  by  the  major  carrier  for  fuel  costs,  the  majors 
must take into account those increased costs and the markets prof-
itability  into  consideration  when  route  and  capacity  decisions  are 
made. 

Major  carriers  have  no  choice  but  to  eliminate  small  community 
routes  that  lose  money  for  long  periods,  even  if  those  routes  con-
tribute some connecting revenues to the mainline system. 

My  colleague,  Jim  May,  has  provided  excellent  data  on  the  in-
crease in jet fuel costs, so I will not repeat this important informa-
tion,  but  I  would  like  to  point  out  the  regional  carriers,  like  their 
major counterparts, have taken steps to minimize fuel burn by low-
ering  cruise  speeds,  safely  altering  approach  paths,  and  reducing 
onboard  weight.  We  also  have  worked  in  cooperation  with  the  Air 
Transport  Association  in  tankering  fuel  to  airports  were  supplies 
are limited. Nonetheless, fuel now ranks as the second highest cost 
for regional airlines just behind labor. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

Regional  carriers  with  both  types  of  compensation  arrangements 
are  clearly  feeling  the  strain,  but  essential  air  service  carriers, 
whose  rates  are  set  at  2-year  levels  by  the  Department  of  Trans-
portation,  are  seeing  major  troubles  as  well.  There  were  problems 
before Hurricane Katrina devastated the Gulf region, but that trag-
edy has made a bad situation even worse. As part of the EAS appli-
cation  process,  carriers  must  project  costs  and  profits  over  this  2-
year time frame. It is no easy task in today’s volatile cost environ-
ment. 

Historically,  in  cases  of  unexpected  cost  increases,  essential  air 
service  carriers  have  had  to  enter  into  the  unpalatable  process  of 
filing notice to terminate service in 90 days to begin the process of 
working  cooperatively  with  DOT  to  seek  compensation  rates  that 
cover the increased costs. This inevitably caused ill will between an 
airline  and  the  community,  and  the  process  also  forced  an  airline 
to operate at a loss for 180 days while DOT reopened the competi-
tive bidding process. This is true despite a cornerstone of the origi-
nal  EAS  law  which  provides  that  no  carrier  should  be  forced  to 
serve a community at a loss. 

Under the leadership of this Subcommittee, Section 402 of Vision 
100 was enacted, providing DOT flexibility in its rate-making proc-
ess in instances where carriers experienced increased costs, defined 
as  a  10  percent  increase  or  more,  consistent  for  two  or  more  con-
secutive  months.  Unfortunately,  DOT  has  declined  to  use  this  tool 
Congress  afforded  it  to  reconcile  fuel  cost  increases  and  EAS  sub-
sidy rates, citing the need for a specific appropriation. As a result, 
carriers are losing money every day on EAS routes and this service 
is in jeopardy. 

RAA  stands  ready  to  help  Congress  further  enact  EAS  program 
reforms as the next FAA Preauthorization takes place. We join our 
ATA colleagues in requesting that Congress provide appropriate re-
lief from the 4.3 cent-a-gallon tax on jet fuel. 

But  there  is  another  issue  unique  to  regional  carriers  that  we 
would  like  Congress  to  consider.  The  jet  fuel  tax  change  included 
in  the  Highway  Bill  now  requires  airlines  to  pay  24.4  cents  up 
front for fuel purchases and file for a rebate from the IRS. This sys-
tem which places the burden on airlines to apply and wait for a re-
fund  of  the  difference  is  causing  a  severe  cash  crunch  for  this  na-
tion’s smallest airlines. These airlines, unlike the major carriers, do 
not  have  any  ticket  tax  payment  to  offset  the  fuel  tax  payments, 
because  in  modern  code-sharing  relationships,  we  do  not  issue  the 
tickets.  We  urge  you  to  amend  the  law  and,  in  the  interim,  to  re-
quire IRS to refund the taxes on a monthly basis. 

Finally, we urge you to work with your colleagues on the Appro-
priations  Committee  to  educate  them  on  the  need  to  appropriate 
the  full,  authorized  amount  of  $127  million  to  prevent  service  loss 
at many communities across the nation. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  and  I  will  look  forward 

to responding to your questions. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. McElroy follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DEBORAH C. MCELROY, PRESIDENT, REGIONAL AIRLINE 

ASSOCIATION 

Introduction and Background 

Good morning. Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, on behalf of the 
45  airline  members  of  the  Regional  Airline  Association,  thank  you  for  inviting  me 
to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  escalating  fuel  costs  and  impacts  on  regional 
airline operations and Essential Air Service in the wake of Hurricane Katrina. 

I  am  Deborah  McElroy,  President  of  the  Regional  Airline  Association,  or  RAA. 
RAA represents regional airlines providing short and medium-haul scheduled airline 
service  connecting  smaller  communities  with  larger  cities  and  hub  airports  oper-
ating  9  to  68  seat  turboprops  and  30  to  108  seat  regional  jets.  Of  the  664  commer-
cial airports in the nation, fully 479 are served exclusively by regional airlines. This 
means,  at  72  percent  of  our  nation’s  commercial  airports,  passengers  rely  on  re-
gional airlines for their only source of scheduled air transportation. 

Of  those  communities,  99  communities  in  the  lower  48  states  as  well  as  three  in 
Hawaii and 33 in Alaska receive subsidized air service by regional carriers through 
the Essential Air Service Program, or EAS, which was enacted as part of the Airline 
Deregulation  Act  of  1978.  The  EAS  program  was  crafted  to  guarantee  that  small 
communities  served  by  certificated  air  carriers  before  deregulation  would  maintain 
a minimum level of scheduled air service after deregulation. 

The program has been in effect each year since 1978 at various funding levels and 
through several eligibility criteria adjustments that take into account distance from 
nearby  hub  airports  and  other  factors.  Most  recently,  in  Fiscal  Year  2005,  the  EAS 
program  was  funded  at  $104  million.  The  House  appropriation  for  FY06  was  $105 
million  and  the  Senate  Appropriation  at  present  stands  at  $110  million.  RAA  esti-
mates the program will need a full $127 million in order to function as enacted dur-
ing  FY06  and  we  remain  committed  to  working  with  Congress  to  ensure  that  the 
larger EAS appropriation—critical for the program—is enacted. 

With your permission, I will return to this topic. First I would like to discuss some 
characteristics of regional airline service. Many of you already know that the major-
ity  of  regional  carriers  operate  in  partnership  with  the  major  airlines  under  code-
sharing agreements. In fact, in 2004 99 percent of the 135 million passengers trans-
ported  by  regional  carriers  traveled  on  code  sharing  airlines.  Code  sharing  agree-
ments, which provide benefits for passengers, regional and major airlines, have two 
broad  methods  of  revenue  sharing.  The  first,  prevalent  among  larger  regional  car-
riers  operating  regional  jets,  occurs  when  a  major  and  regional  airline  enter  into  a 
‘‘fee  for  departure’’  or  ‘‘capacity  buy’’  agreement  where  the  major  compensates  the 
regional  airline  a  predetermined  rate  for  flying  a  specific  schedule.  Within  this  ar-
rangement are mandatory standards for customer service, on-time performance and 
baggage handling requirements and incentives rewarding excellent performance. 

A  second  arrangement,  common  to  smaller,  turboprop  operators,  occurs  when 
major  airlines  pay  regional  airlines  a  portion  of  passenger  ticket  revenue.  This  is 
referred to as ‘‘pro-rate’’ or ‘‘shared revenue’’ flying. 

While  regional  airlines  with  pro-rate  agreements  are  most  vulnerable  to  cost  in-
creases and the recent fuel cost crisis, it is important to note that fee-for departure 
carriers  also  suffer  when  fuel  costs  increase  this  dramatically.  Even  if  the  regional 
airline  is  compensated  by  the  major  airline  for  fuel  costs,  the  majors  must  take 
those  increased  costs  and  the  market’s  profitability  into  consideration  when  route 
and capacity decisions are made. Major carriers have no choice but to eliminate re-
gional routes that lose money for long periods, even if those routes contribute some 
connecting  revenues  to  the  mainline  system.  As  you  know,  most  of  the  major  air-
lines  are  experiencing  some  of  the  most  daunting  challenges  in  the  history  of  the 
industry.  They  cannot  afford  to  continue  unprofitable  routes  and  when  this  service 
is  discontinued,  regional  airlines  and  passengers  in  small  communities  suffer  as 
well. 

With jet fuel costs expected to rise by more than $9 billion this year, regional air-
lines  are  being  hit  hard.  In  July  2005,  jet  fuel  averaged  $1.66  per  gallon—52  cents 
more  than  in  July  2004.  According  to  one  RAA  member,  this  meant  that  the  592 
gallons of fuel required for a 40 seat regional jet to fly approximately 600 miles cost 
$1,024 in July 2005 compared with $600 just one year before. The effect of Katrina 
has  produced  an  even  more  dramatic  jump  in  fuel  costs  so  that  even  with  load  fac-
tors  at  an  all-time  high,  the  U.S.  airline  industry  collectively  is  struggling  finan-
cially  due  to  the  unprecedented  jump  in  oil  prices  and  an  even  more  dramatic  in-
crease in the price of jet fuel. 

Regional  airlines  are  providing  critical  service  to  smaller  communities  with  air-
planes  that  use  much  less  fuel  than  larger  aircraft.  Turboprop  aircraft  are  among 
the most fuel efficient aircraft for short-haul routes and RJs have some of the most 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

modern, fuel efficient engines in the airline industry. Like our major airline counter-
parts,  regional  carriers  have  sought  to  minimize  fuel  burn  by  tankering  fuel,  low-
ering  cruise  speeds,  safely  altering  approach  plans  and  reducing  onboard  weight, 
making  every  effort  to  manage  escalating  fuel  costs  with  an  eye  toward  conserva-
tion.  Nonetheless,  fuel  now  ranks  as  the  second  highest  cost  for  airlines,  ranking 
just behind labor. 

Regional  airlines  with  both  types  of  compensation  arrangements  are  certainly 
feeling  the  strain.  But  Essential  Air  Service  carriers,  whose  rates  are  set  at  two-
year  levels  by  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT),  are  seeing  major  troubles 
as well. There were problems before Hurricane Katrina devastated the gulf coast on 
August 29, 2005, but that tragedy has made a bad situation even worse. 
Hurricane Katrina 

Fuel  costs  were  already  devastatingly  high  for  U.S.  carriers  before  Hurricane 
Katrina  crippled  oil  and  gas  operations  in  the  Gulf  Coast  and  shut  down  most  of 
the  output  from  the  region.  Because  my  colleague  from  the  Air  Transport  Associa-
tion  went  over  these  numbers  in  detail,  I  will  focus  on  service  impacts,  except  to 
underscore  the  fact  that  Katrina  initially  wiped  out  19  percent  of  domestic  refining 
capacity,  including  13  percent  of  the  nation’s  daily  jet  fuel  production.  Further,  oil 
imports  are  down  10  percent  because  of  Katrina’s  extensive  damage  to  Louisiana’s 
major oil-import terminal. 

By September 1, jet fuel prices had risen 49 cents per gallon to $2.36, from $1.87 
on  August  17.  While  recovery  efforts  and  action  by  various  federal  agencies  have 
led to the price of jet fuel being $2.00 per gallon today, this cost remains untenable 
for major and regional carriers alike. 

Some  lawmakers  have  suggested  that  carriers  pass  along  fuel  increases  to  pas-
sengers.  But  competition  has  not  become  less  intense  just  because  fuel  prices  have 
skyrocketed.  In  fact,  regional  airlines  compete  not  only  carrier  to  carrier.  In  short-
haul markets, we compete with the automobile. Data from the most recent DOT In-
spector  General’s  ‘‘Aviation  Industry  Performance’’  report  indicates  that  scheduled 
flights  in  markets  of  249  miles  or  less  declined  26  percent  when  you  compare  July 
2005 to July 2000. For regional airlines, significant fare increases can mean signifi-
cantly fewer passengers. 

Business passengers, who constitute more than 65 percent of regional airline trav-
elers,  have  embraced  advances  in  communications  technology,  making  traveling 
more elective than ever and highly price-sensitive. Airlines may be able to enact fuel 
surcharges,  but  these  surcharges  would  still  fail  to  recoup  the  losses  incurred  due 
to the recent spike in fuel costs. Further, given the numerous differences in pro-rate 
agreements  for  smaller  regional  airlines,  it  is  likely  that  the  increase  in  revenue 
from  their  pro-rata  portion  of  the  fuel  surcharge  would  not  fully  compensate  them 
for their increased fuel costs. 
Essential Air Service 

The  Essential  Air  Service  program  is  administered  by  the  Department  of  Trans-
portation,  where  ‘‘best  and  final’’  competitive  proposals  are  submitted  by  regional 
carriers.  The  Department  selects  carriers  and  establishes  EAS  subsidy  rates  based 
on that bidding process. 

If  a  carrier  is  the  only  airline  serving  an  EAS  eligible  community  and  wishes  to 
exit the market, DOT regulations require it to file a 90 day service termination no-
tice.  DOT  may  hold  that  carrier  in  the  market  during  this  period,  while  a  subsidy 
eligibility  review  or  competitive  bidding  process  is  undertaken.  Likewise,  carriers 
operating  EAS  subsidized  routes  must  also  file  a  90  day  service  termination—sub-
ject  to  even  more  onerous  hold-in  policies—in  order  to  trigger  a  renegotiation  of 
rates if costs increase significantly during the lifetime of the rate agreement. 

As part of the EAS application process, carriers negotiate in good faith with DOT 
on subsidy rates that remain in effect for two years. As part of the competitive bid-
ding  process,  EAS  carriers  must  project  costs  and  profits  over  this  two-year  time-
frame—no easy task in today’s volatile cost environment. In cases of unexpected cost 
increases,  EAS  carriers  have  no  tool  to  renegotiate  rates  and  must  instead  enter 
into the unpalatable process of filing notice saying that the carrier intends to termi-
nate its service in 90 days to begin the process for seeking compensation rates that 
cover  their  increased  costs.  This  inevitably  causes  ill-will  between  an  airline  and 
community,  in  some  cases  fostering  a  sense  of  unreliability  that  ultimately  under-
mines  the  use  of  the  air  service  and  further  drives  up  subsidy  rates  (as  fewer  pas-
sengers  traveling  causes  air  fares  to  climb).  And  the  process  also  forces  carriers  to 
operate  at  a  loss  for  180  days  while  DOT  reopens  the  competitive  bidding  process. 
This  is  true  despite  a  cornerstone  of  the  original  EAS  law  which  provides  that  no 
carrier should ever be forced to serve any community at a loss. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

During deliberation of Vision 100, the most recent FAA Reauthorization bill, Con-
gress noticed the destructive effects of rising fuel costs on the EAS program. Under 
the leadership of this Subcommittee, Section 402 of Vision 100 included a provision 
giving  DOT  flexibility  in  its  rate-making  process  in  those  instances  where  carriers 
experienced ‘‘significantly increased costs.’’ With an eye to preventing deliberate cost 
underestimation, Congress included an index where ‘‘significant increase’’ is defined 
as  a  10  percent  increase  in  unit  costs  that  persists  for  two  or  more  consecutive 
months. Unfortunately, DOT has declined to use the tool Congress afforded it to rec-
oncile fuel cost increases and EAS subsidy rates, citing the need for a specific appro-
priation.  As  a  result,  carriers  are  losing  money  on  EAS  routes  in  unprecedented 
numbers. 

As  just  one  example,  in  July  2004,  the  fuel  cost  for  a  Beech  1900  on  a  one-hour 
(block time) flight was $133.41. In July 2005, the fuel cost had increased to $202.12, 
nearly  52  percent  higher.  Only  two  months  later,  for  the  week  ending  September 
2,  fuel  costs  for  that  flight  were  $272.51,  up  35  percent  from  July.  These  figures 
utilize  jet  fuel  purchasing  formulas  commonly  employed  by  regional  airlines,  based 
on cost data tracked in the Energy Information Administration’s Weekly Petroleum 
Status  Report.  It  is  important  to  note  that  these  figures  calculate  base  fuel  cost 
only—they  do  not  include  ‘‘into  plane  fees’’  and  federal,  state  and  local  fuel  taxes. 
The  overall  losses  across  all  EAS  carriers  are  staggering  and  the  program,  as  we 
know it, is in jeopardy. 

In fact, we estimate that current fuel cost increases for all carriers in the program 
will  drive  up  program  costs  significantly  even  if  not  one  more  community  becomes 
eligible  in  the  next  fiscal  year.  Yet,  according  to  the  DOT  website,  there  are  cur-
rently  60  EAS-eligible,  single-carrier  markets  which  could  come  into  the  program. 
(While  more  than  60  communities  are  technically  ‘‘eligible’’  I  am  referencing  those 
that  received  service  pre-deregulation  and  do  not  meet  other  disqualifying  factors 
such  as  distance  to  nearby  airports).  Of  those  60  communities,  anywhere  from  15 
to  30  could  begin  to  require  subsidy  should  the  carriers  file  termination  notices. 
Given the significant reductions in small community service and substantial cost in-
creases affecting the airlines, it is reasonable and responsible to plan for more than 
half  of  all  eligible  communities  to  soon  require  subsidy.  Under  even  the  most  opti-
mistic  scenario,  therefore,  the  DOT  will  need  at  least  $127  million  in  Fiscal  Year 
2006, to run the program. This Appropriation should also contain a line-item direct-
ing  DOT  to  utilize  the  rate-adjustment  tool  afforded  by  Vision  100  to  accommodate 
dramatic fuel cost increases. 

Early versions of a Senate appropriation sought to fix this problem by prohibiting 
newly  eligible  communities  from  collecting  subsidy;  yet  such  a  prohibition  runs 
counter  to  the  original  intent  of  the  law,  which  guarantees  air  service  to  eligible 
communities. 

RAA  stands  ready  to  help  Congress  enact  further  EAS  program  reforms  as  the 
next FAA reauthorization takes place. We are eager to discuss a rewrite of the eligi-
bility  criteria,  realizing  that  some  rules  set  nearly  three  decades  ago  no  longer 
apply.  Nonetheless,  the  most  important  thing  Congress  could  do  right  now  to  help 
passengers  in  EAS  communities  and  the  airlines  is  to  release  the  full  authorized 
amount of $127 million for the EAS program in FY06 and to require DOT’s coopera-
tion in making real-time rate adjustments for cost increases. 
Request for Congressional Action

• Considering  the  staggering  impact  that  increased  fuel  costs  have  brought  for 
U.S. regional and major airlines alike, RAA requests, along with our colleagues 
at  the  Air  Transport  Association,  that  Congress  provide  a  tax  holiday  on  the 
$4.3  cents-a-gallon  tax  on  jet  fuel.  Further,  we  request  that  any  fuel  surcharge 
charged  by  carriers  be  exempt  from  the  existing  7.5  percent  passenger  ticket 
tax.
• We  further  request  that  Congress  reconsider  changes  to  the  jet  fuel  tax  rate 
that  were  made  as  part  of  the  American  Jobs  Creation  Act  enacted  last  year 
and the additional proposed change included in the Highway bill that would re-
quire airlines to pay 24.4 cents up front for fuel purchases and file for a rebate 
from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS). This system, which places the burden 
on airlines to apply and wait for a refund of the difference, with tax on jet fuel 
at  $4.3  cents  per  gallon,  is  causing  a  severe  cash  crunch  for  smaller  regional 
airlines.  Changes  already  implemented  by  the  American  Jobs  Creation  Act 
brought  the  upfront  costs  to  21.4  cents  per  gallon  with  the  highway  bill  poised 
raising  the  burden  even  further.  Regional  airlines  do  not  have  any  ticket  tax 
payments to offset the fuel tax payments because, in modern code sharing rela-
tionships,  we  do  not  issue  the  tickets.  We  urge  you  to  amend  the  law  and,  in 
the  interim,  to  require  IRS  to  refund  the  taxes  on  a  monthly  basis.  This  tax 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

and refund procedure places a tremendous burden on airlines and impacts cash 
flow at a time when carriers are already struggling mightily from fuel costs.

• Finally,  we  urge  you  to  work  with  your  colleagues  on  the  Appropriations  Com-
mittee  to  educate  them  on  the  need  to  appropriate  the  full,  authorized  amount 
of  $127  million  dollars  to  keep  the  important  EAS  program  afloat  during  this 
period  of  dramatic  fuel  cost  increases.  The  fuel  cost  increases  resulting  from 
Hurricane Katrina have further injured the financial state of EAS carriers who, 
without rate adjustments and compensation for increased fuel costs, cannot con-
tinue  to  sustain  service  at  a  loss.  Only  a  full  appropriation  of  $127  million  can 
prevent service losses at multiple EAS points across the nation.

Conclusion 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify on this important issue today. I look for-

ward to responding to your questions at the conclusion of the panel.

Senator  BURNS.  And  I  have  one  question  that  I  want  to  ask  of 
Mr. May and then I have some more follow-up questions. Mr. May, 
are  your  members  right  now  paying  higher  fuel  prices  on  their 
international  flights  and  where  they  purchase  fuel  at  foreign  air-
ports? 

Mr. MAY. Excuse me. Mr. Chairman, the $9 billion increase year-
over-year from 2004 to 2005 is both domestic and international. So 
the answer is, yes, we are indeed. 

Senator BURNS. Did we hit such a spike on our international air-

ports as we did domestically? 

Mr.  MAY.  The  answer  is  no,  because  of  the  weakness  of  the  dol-
lar. Fuel is more affordable, if you will, not as expensive in Europe 
as it is here in the United States. 

Senator BURNS. Senator McCain. 
Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. May, you would like to see some relief from some of the tax-

ation, is that correct? 
Mr. MAY. Yes, sir. 
Senator MCCAIN. Then your first priority is the 4.3 cents jet fuel 

taxes, is that correct? 

Mr. MAY. Senator McCain, we think that tax was intended origi-
nally to be temporary, used for deficit reduction, but has remained 
on the books, albeit in favor of the Aviation Trust Fund, is the best 
candidate  for  short-term  immediate  relief  with  the  understanding 
that  it  is  equally  important  that  we  keep  the  trust  fund  whole.  It 
scores  at  about  $600  million,  and  I  think  we  would  hope  that  the 
Congress  would  entertain  a  one-time  supplemental  to  the  trust 
fund to keep it whole. 

Senator  BURNS.  Are  you  calling  for  a  permanent  or  temporary 

suspension of the jet fuel tax. 

Mr.  MAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  pay  $15  billion  a  year  in  taxes  and 
fees.  I  would  like  to  reduce  that  level  across  the  board.  I  think  in 
the  2007  Reauthorization,  the  seven  fees  that  we  currently  pay  to 
the Trust Fund ought to be consolidated into one, and we ought to 
find  a  better  way  to  do  it.  But  for  the  immediate  term,  I  think  a 
temporary  holiday,  if  you  will,  of  a  year  would  be  the  most  appro-
priate course of action. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  would  like  for  you  to  stop  by  the  next  time 
we have an Amtrak hearing and hear the Amtrak people complain 
about  how  much  we  subsidize  the  airlines  as  opposed  to  our  much 
needed Sunset Limited. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

Let  me  ask  you:  Now  we  have  got  two  airlines  going  into  bank-
ruptcy. When an airline is in bankruptcy, it no longer has to fulfill 
certain requirements, right? 

Mr. MAY. The airline has certain leverages that——
Senator  MCCAIN.  Or  any  organization  that  goes  into  bank-

Mr. MAY.—it does not have outside of Chapter 11, right. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Among  those  are  payments  in  the  pension 

ruptcy——

fund. 

Mr. MAY. That is correct. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  So—and  how  many  airlines  do  we  have  in 

bankruptcy now? 

Mr.  MAY.  Sir,  we  have  got  United  Airlines,  U.S.  Airways,  and 
ATA of my membership that are currently in bankruptcy. We have 
the  prospect  of  two  more  today  or  within  a  short  period  of  time, 
which  would  mean  that  some  47  percent  of  capacity  in  the  United 
States is in Chapter 11. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  And  all  of  those  airlines  are  no  longer  paying 

into their pension funds? 

expert on the pension issues. 

Mr. MAY. Senator, I am not sure that is correct, but I am not the 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  think  it  has  been  reported  in  the  media.  I 
worry  about  that.  Does  that  mean  that  you  are—that  the  airline 
industry  has  taken  a  position  on  increasing  retirement  age  of  pi-
lots? 

Mr.  MAY.  We  have  as  ATA  held  a  position  that  the  retirement 

of 60 ought to be maintained. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  That  is  remarkable.  Just  out  of  curiosity,  on 
what basis? That these pilots, if they stay until the age 62, are too 
old? 

Mr.  MAY.  No,  I  do  not  think  it  is  based  on  age  or  incompetence 
at  age  60.  It  has  been  a  standard  in  the  industry  for  some  period 
of time. 

Senator MCCAIN. So do not change it. It is interesting. I am sure 
other  members  of  the  Committee  have  the  same  experience;  I  am 
approached  by  pilots  in  the  airports  all  the  time,  and  I  can  tell  by 
looking at them whether they are in favor of increasing retirement 
age or whether they are in favor of keeping it the same. 

Mr. MAY. Well, as the Senator points out——
Senator MCCAIN. The younger ones feel the same. 
Mr.  MAY.  There  is  a  dispute  among  the  pilot  community  as  to 

which way to go. 

Senator MCCAIN. Yes, that is what I tell them in response. Twen-
ty percent—twenty-six percent of the total ticket price that is paid 
by a passenger now goes in some form to fees or taxes, is that cor-
rect? 

Mr.  MAY.  On  an  average  $200  ticket,  which  is  close  to  the  aver-

age today, yes, sir. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  If  we  do  nothing—suppose  the  Congress  and 
the  Federal  Government  do  nothing.  What  is  going  to  happen  in 
the  airline  industry?  Consolidation;  airlines  going  out  of  business; 
limp  along  and  go  in  and  out  of  bankruptcy  as  we  have  seen;  fur-
ther restructuring and, finally—well, go ahead and respond to that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

Mr.  MAY.  Senator,  I  think  that  the  industry  has  taken  extraor-
dinary  steps  for  self-help  over  the  past  couple  of  years  and,  as  I 
said  in  my  testimony,  were  it  not  for  fuel  right  now,  I  think  this 
would be a profitable industry. At the same time, I think it is unre-
alistic to suggest that there is not going to be additional consolida-
tion in this industry. 

Both domestically and if Congress changes the law, I think there 
will  be  international  consolidation.  We,  live,  work,  fly  in  a  world 
economy,  if  you  will,  but  our  hope  is  that  this  Congress  will  take 
a  hard  look  at  not  only  the  overall  tax  and  fee  structure  that  we 
have but the impact of fuel, in particular, on the industry. 

Senator MCCAIN. Well, I hope we do, Mr. May, because I, among 
others,  rely  on  the  board  of  experts  who  believe  that  the  price  of 
fuel  is  never  going  to  go  down  significantly  due  to  increased  de-
mand  on  the  part  of  other  nations.  Would  you  submit  to  the  Com-
mittee  specific  changes  that  you  would  like  to  see  and,  as  far  as 
any other relaxation—would just the jet fuel tax do it for you? 

Mr.  MAY.  No,  sir.  It  is  only  a  small  step  in  the  right  direction. 
I  think  that  Congress  needs  to  revisit  the  entire  tax  and  fee  equa-
tion  that  applies  not  only  to  this  industry,  but  that  is  tied  inex-
tricably  to  the  appropriate  growth  and  change  necessary  at  FAA 
and the overall air traffic control system. 

Senator MCCAIN. I would ask that you would submit to the Com-
mittee  a  detailed  position  as  to  what  you  would  like,  what  kind  of 
relief you would like to see——

Mr. MAY. I would be happy to do that, sir. 
Senator MCCAIN.—take place. 
I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator BURNS. Senator Stevens—oh, Senator Lott has joined us. 

Do you have a statement, Senator Lott? 

Senator LOTT. I will wait until after Senator Stevens. 
Senator BURNS. OK. Thank you. Go ahead. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. May, one of the things we are doing on the Committee is re-
viewing all of the laws that apply that have come out of this Com-
mittee  and  determine  whether  there  are  roadblocks  in  them  that 
prevent  our  making  waivers  and  doing  things  which  give  us  a 
chance  to  have  some  application  of  current  revenues  and  current 
preparations  to  the  recovery,  and  use  current  authorities  without 
having massive new legislation. 

Have  you  examined  any  of  the  laws  present  about  conditions  or 
requirements  under  those  laws  that  are  currently  preventing  the 
airlines from taking steps that are necessary in view of the disaster 
and recovery from the disaster? 

Mr. MAY. Mr. Chairman, I have noted a couple things in my tes-
timony  and,  certainly,  relief  on  the  4.3-cent  tax  is  one.  We  sug-
gested  to  the  Department  of  Transportation  that  we  be  permitted 
to impose fuel surcharges separate and apart from the actual ticket 
price.  They  took  some  action  yesterday  to  put  out  for  a  notice  of 
comment in rulemaking whether or not to eliminate those rules al-
together,  and  we  appreciate  the  direction  that  Secretary  Mineta 
has taken on that point. 

I think there are a number of areas that Ms. McElroy has identi-
fied this morning that are specific to the regional side of this busi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

ness,  part  of  which  is  owned  and  operated  by  my  carriers,  part  of 
which operates on a separate basis. 

We would be happy to reexamine some specific areas in the regu-
latory  process  that  may  be  of  some  benefit  and  submit  that  to  the 
Committee as Senator McCain has suggested. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Now,  for  last  year  the  airlines  that  altogether 

paid $15 billion into Federal taxes? 

Mr. MAY. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  But  they  lost  $10  billion  overall.  Have  you 
looked,  again,  now,  at  these  taxes?  You  have  asked  us  to  suspend 
the one. 

Mr. MAY. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  The  airlines  are  the  only  entity  in  the  country 
that collect from their customers the costs, or at least partially the 
costs, of security. 

Mr. MAY. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Have you looked at that? Should we reduce that 
or in any way find some way to reduce the cost of the security pro-
gram in order to free up more area for your increase in fares? 

Mr.  MAY.  Senator,  we  pay,  as  you  have  just  noted,  a  little  bit 
north  of  $15  billion  a  year  in  taxes  and  fees.  That  includes  some 
$3 billion to $3.5 billion a year directly to DHS/TSA. I think we are 
one  of  the  only  industries  that  directly  undertakes  funding  of  TSA 
and  DHS.  We  do  it  through  five  different  taxes  and  fees.  We  have 
seven  different  taxes  and  fees  that  underwrite  the  lion’s  share  of 
the Aviation and Airport and Airways Trust Fund. 

I  think  it  would  be  fully  appropriate  for  this  Committee  to  take 
a long, hard look at that entire funding equation and make a deter-
mination  as  to  what  ought  to  remain,  what  ought  to  be  jettisoned, 
and  how  we  can  help  reduce  the  overall  impact  of  26  percent  on 
an  average  $200  ticket,  which  is  far  greater  than  any  other  indus-
try  in  the  United  States  pays  in  taxes  and  fees,  greater  even  than 
alcoholic  beverages  and  tobacco  products  where  taxes  are  used  as 
a disincentive to consumption. 

The CHAIRMAN. We have provided that some of the airports could 
take  over  their  own  security  if  they  desire  to  do  so.  To  my  knowl-
edge,  only  one  did.  Have  you  had  any  contact  with  the  airports  to 
see whether they could take over the security and reduce the costs? 
Mr. MAY. I think that the airports have had a long working rela-
tionship with TSA on that very issue. I think the Senator is correct 
that there was only one airport that took advantage of that oppor-
tunity  to  date.  I  am  not  sure,  Senator,  that  there  is  a  huge  dollar 
difference if it is privatized or federalized. I think the dollar impact 
is roughly the same. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  what  about  your  costs—the  airlines’  costs 
of  the  modernization  of  airports  for,  say,  the  passenger  portion? 
That is substantial, is it not? 

Mr.  MAY.  We  find  that  the  hassle  factor,  if  you  will,  opposed  by 
TSA  is  having  a  direct  impact  on  our  potential  customers.  A  num-
ber of people are driving or using other modes of transportation as 
opposed to going through the hassle factor. 

At the same time, there are significant costs that get imposed on 
the carriers, sort of the end reimbursed costs from catering security 
to  direct  security  at  airports,  to  cost  of  inline  EDS,  et  cetera.  We 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

have  suggested  for  some  time  that  we  need  to  take  a  hard  look  at 
how TSA is funded and make a determination as to whether or not 
it ought to be through the carriers themselves, either through fees 
imposed in taxes or un-reimbursed expenses, or airport derived ex-
penses, or through general tax revenues. 

The CHAIRMAN. It just seems to me there is a lot of chefs stirring 
this stew, and I wonder if we have to go into debt when the overall 
structural  relationship  of  government  to  airlines,  and  part  of  it  is 
in  the  tax  base  and  that  is  hard  to  deal  with,  but  I  do  think  we 
ought to take a real long look. We do not have the time now during 
this disaster period, but I think we ought to take a long look at to-
tally  revamping  the  relationship  of  government  to  the  airline  sys-
tem  and  deal  with  some  of  those  taxes  in  a  way  of  trying  to  find 
some  way  to  reduce  the  redundancy  and  the  management  that 
comes  from  county  and  local  and  airport  executives,  and  entities 
themselves, but the ownership concept. All of those things are lead-
ing to problems. 

I  know  I  am  taking  a  little  bit  more  time.  I  would  like  to  ask 

Mr. Miller about the problem. 

You  said  that  one  of  the  problems  was,  as  I  understand  it,  you 
had to go to too many entities to deal with disasters and you would 
like  some  way  to  go  directly  to  the  coordinator  and  you  suggested, 
I  think,  that  we  should  go  into  some  concept  of  regional 
prepositioning  of  disaster  equipment.  Could  you  enlarge  on  that  a 
little bit? 

Mr. MILLER. Yes, Mr. Chairman. What we found out is that dur-
ing the immediate times following that natural disaster, that there 
is  a  need  for  a  lot  of  equipment,  building  materials,  supplies,  but 
that  we  have  to  work  through  multiple  state  agencies  in  order  to 
get  those  supplies  in  there.  The  airports  that  are  responding  want 
to  respond  to  that  airport.  They  want  to  get  there  as  quickly  as 
they can, but there are protocols that have to be followed. As I stat-
ed,  Bruce  Fraylik  was  required  to  contact  the  Mississippi  EOC, 
which would then contact either the State of Florida or Georgia or 
South Carolina to initiate a request for a specific airport. 

We  feel  that  if  we  had  one  point-of-contact  within  FEMA,  they 
could  be  making  those  contacts  for  us.  They  could  be  asking  those 
airports  to  respond.  They  could  be  issuing  the  mission  numbers 
that  would  allow  those  airports  to  respond  as  quickly  as  possible. 
The State Emergency Operations Centers are so involved in all the 
community-wide disaster relief that we do tend to get overrun. We 
do  feel  that  to  make  it  easier  for  them  and  for  us,  that  a  direct 
point of contact within FEMA would help to facilitate the response 
from the other airports. 

The CHAIRMAN. We will follow up on that. 
Last,  Ms.  McElroy,  all  of  us  are  not—at  least,  I  am  not  familiar 

with this 24-cent Highway Act provision you were talking about. 

Ms.  MCELROY.  What  I  heard  from  the  carriers,  Senator,  is  that 
there  was—thank  you.  What  I  have  been  informed  from  the  car-
riers is, because of concerns about jet fuel which head the lower tax 
rate,  concerns  about  that  being  fraudulently  purchased  by  other 
consumers,  the  change  was  made  to  increase  that  tax  rate,  and 
then  the  airlines  filed  for  a  return  of  the  overage  that  they  paid, 
if you will, over the 4.3 cents. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

It  is  my  understanding  from  talking  to  the  major  carriers,  that 
they have been able to use ticket tax revenues owed to the govern-
ment  to  offset  those  fuel  payments  and,  as  a  result,  it  has  not 
caused the cash crunch it has for some of the very smaller regional 
airlines.  I  would  certainly  be  willing  to  provide  you  additional  in-
formation specifics. 

The CHAIRMAN. That is good. Can you get us a one-pager? 
Ms. MCELROY. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Or  we  can  talk  with  the  tax  people  at  the  Fi-

nance Committee and Ways and Means about that. 

Ms. MCELROY. Yes, sir. We would very much appreciate that. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator BURNS. Senator Lott. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator LOTT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for having this hearing 
so quickly to address the problems and the needs of a very critical 
part of our economy, the aviation industry. 

I hope that you, as Chairman of the Subcommittee, and you, Mr. 
Chairman, will continue as you have been to identify specific things 
that,  maybe,  can  be  done  very  quickly  to  provide  some  relief  and 
some help and, as in the case of my own state, and probably Pensa-
cola  has  experienced  this,  too,  there  is  not  enough—the  state  is 
only eligible for, like, $5 million for repairs through AIP. Just some 
little  modification  in  the  existing  law  would  allow  us  to  get  more 
like  $35  or  $40  million,  which  is  what  we  will  need  to  do  the  re-
pairs  at  our  airports  in  the  aftermath  of  Hurricane  Katrina,  and 
there are other areas where I think we can take some small actions 
or quick actions that would make a big difference. 

I  want  to  thank  the  industry  for  the  expeditious  handling  and 
management  of  the  effort  to  get  our  airlines  and  our  airports  back 
up and operating. FAA, I think, should be commended for their ef-
ficiency  in  getting  our  Mississippi  airports  back  up  and  running. 
Gulfport/Biloxi  Regional  is  fully  operational.  Jackson  International 
is  only  temporarily  shut  down.  Even  Stennis  International  Airport 
has been open. 

In  all  of  this  negativity  and  complaining,  I  do  think  that  the  ef-
fort that has been made by the Administration, by FAA, by the air-
ports,  and  by  the  airlines  deserve  credit.  We  particularly  appre-
ciate,  in  my  state,  the  fact  that  Delta  and  Northwest  and  Conti-
nental American, they are all back in there, and they are back very 
close to a full service. That is very, very important. 

Also,  even  though  you  are  struggling  financially  as  an  industry, 
many  of  your  companies  have  been  generously  involved  in  pro-
viding  transportation,  and  supplies,  and  contributions.  And  we  do, 
we recognize that, and we thank your industry. And I put a list of 
companies that have done that sort of thing beyond the call of duty 
in  the  Congressional  Record  when  I  first  returned  last  week.  And 
the list is there and it includes some of the airlines. 

Now,  with  regard  to  energy:  Sir,  are  we  still  releasing  oil  from 
the SPRO in view of the disaster decline and supply, and the spike 
in price? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

Dr. GRUENSPECHT. I think the bids on the SPRO release were re-
ceived last week and they are under evaluation in the Department, 
and I think you will hear from the Secretary of Energy in the very 
near future on that. 

Senator LOTT. I would have hoped he would have moved quickly. 

It has been 2 weeks——

Dr. GRUENSPECHT. Well, we already have——
Senator LOTT.—and the problem was there before the hurricane. 
Dr.  GRUENSPECHT.  Right.  And  we  have  a  couple  things.  One, 
there  have  been  loans  of  oil  that  have  already  taken  place  to  the 
refiners.  In  terms  of  the  release  of  SPRO,  there  is  a  process  that 
has to be followed. 

Senator  LOTT.  Cut  the  process  in  half,  please,  sir.  Get  rid  of  bu-
reaucratic  crap  and  rules  and  I  mean  we  need  supply.  My  home-
town  refinery,  which  has  the  capability  of  refining  365,000  barrels 
a  day,  is  shut  down.  We  have  got  the  channel  open  so  we  could 
bring  in  oil  as  soon  as  they  are  able  to  go  back  into  being  oper-
ational,  but  they  also  had  the  jet  fuel  and  gasoline  in  their  tanks 
which  they  immediately  started  distributing  but  they  have  about 
done all they can there. 

I  can  just—I  want  the  Administration,  the  Energy  Department, 
that people are emotionally very distraught by what they have seen 
from  the  hurricane.  They  do  feel  very  tense  about  Iraq  obviously, 
but  the  thing  that  is  making  the  people  the  maddest  has  been 
when they go to the pump to fill up their tanks. Now, you can give 
me  a  lecture  about  freeing  up,  supply  and  demand,  and  all  that 
other  stuff.  It  is  not  good  enough.  We  had  better  realize  there  is 
a problem with certain farmers, small businessmen and women——

Dr. GRUENSPECHT. I understand——
Senator  LOTT.—with  children,  and  we,  at  least,  need  to  impro-
vise. Can we at least say, ‘‘This is bad. We know it is bad’’ and take 
a  look,  like  we  care  and  we  are  doing  something  about  it?  And  I 
think  the  Energy  Department  needs  to  be  a  little  bit  more  aggres-
sive  in  jawboning  the  industry  as  a  whole;  and  I  do  not  know—I 
am  not  prepared  to  take  irrational  actions.  But  if  we  do  not  get 
some change in energy prices and supply and all of that, the Amer-
ican people are going to demand that we do something and it may 
not  be  good.  So,  pass  that  back  to  the  Secretary  and  the  Adminis-
tration. Cut the baloney in half. Let us get some action, please, sir. 
You  know,  I  have  tried  very  hard  to  be  helpful  to  the  aviation 
industry,  enjoyed  being  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee.  We  did 
pass  some  specific  funding  after  we  went  into  Iraq.  Of  course,  we 
did  have  specific  action  after  9/11.  We  have  passed  a  temporary 
pension change a year or so ago. We did quickly move a new, broad 
and,  I  think,  good  FAA  reauthorization.  So,  we  have  made  some 
real efforts, and yet the difficulties continue or get worse. 

And  I  know  that  you  are  in  this  situation  because  of  bad  laws 
on  the  books  that  we  passed  in  terms  of  how  you  handle  labor  ne-
gotiations,  bad  management  decisions  over  a  period  of  years  that 
have now come to roost with the current management team at the 
aviation industry. And I think you have some good people in place 
now, but decisions that were being made 5 to 10 years ago are now 
just devastating to industry. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

I  know  that  we  have  unaffordable  labor  contracts.  I  know  we 
have unrealistic pension laws. I know that you have heavy fees and 
taxes that are a real drain, and now you have been hammered with 
the  rising  fuel  costs  and,  to  cap  it  all  off,  Katrina.  It  caused  mil-
lions  of  dollars  of  loss  by  flights  that  were  shut  down  and  flights 
that are not flying yet. So, jiminy, it is a big problem. 

Now, I just got very concerned about everybody going into bank-
ruptcy.  I  do  not  see  how  we  can  stand  to  let  it  happen.  We  need 
more  common  sense  by  the  industry  people,  broadly;  and  we  need 
to do more in Congress to deal and to have a realistic plan for the 
future of aviation. 

So,  I  am  hoping  that  we  will  do  three  things:  One,  that  the 
Chairman of the Subcommittee and the full Chairman will quickly 
pass some changes in the laws that could have quick effect on help-
ing  the  industry,  everything  from  the  airports  and  regional  air-
planes and the industry as a whole. Two, what broader things can 
we do that will have a positive effect? And, three, what is the long-
term plan? 

You know, in my own area, which is devastated, we are not just 
looking at this as recovery and reconstruction, but we want renais-
sance.  We  want  this  to  be  an  example  that  will  really  make  it  a 
shining  recovery  and  one  that  we  can  all  benefit  from  and  the 
country can learn from. I hope the industry will be thinking about 
that too, because we need the aviation industry. 

There  are  just  so  many  things—I  have  so  many  problems  with 
TSA.  You  know,  I  have  so  many  problems  with  the  indefensibility 
of  your  ticketing  pricing  arrangements.  Being  from  a  rural  state 
and flying into Kentucky a lot, sometimes I do not understand why 
you  can  fly  for  $200  here  and  $1,100  somewhere  else  but  we  will 
get into that another day. I know all the answers. 

Senator BURNS. You ought to live in Montana, Senator. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator LOTT. I know the arguments, but now, here is the second 
part  of  that  equation.  What  could  we  do  that  maybe  would  have  a 
bigger  impact?  Not  just  little  tweaks,  but  there  are  two  things: 
One, you suggested, Mr. May, the 4.3-cents-a-gallon. Now, last year 
or  the  year  before,  right  at  the  end  of  the  session  the  year  before, 
I  guess,  last  year,  we  repealed  the  4.3-cent-a-gallon  tax  on  rail-
roads and barges. 

Mr. MAY. That is correct. 
Senator  LOTT.  Are  you  the  only  people  now  that  are  still  paying 
the  old  4.3-cent-a-gallon  tax  we  put  in  place  for  deficit  reduction? 
Mr.  MAY.  I  think  there  are  variations  of  that  tax  that  are  still 
paid by other industries, but we are the only transportation-related 
business that——

Senator LOTT. Now, this one we put in place for deficit reduction 

back in the nineties——

Mr. MAY. Yes, sir, 1993. 
Senator LOTT. OK. That money though——
Mr. MAY. It was supposed to be on a temporary basis. 
Senator  LOTT.  Temporary.  Well,  temporary  in  the  eyes  of  the 

Chinese could be hundreds of years, so——

[Laughter.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

32

Senator  LOTT.  That  money  does  go  in  the  Trust  Fund,  though, 

Mr. MAY. Aviation Trust Fund, yes, sir. 
Senator  LOTT.  Well,  we  need  all  the  money  we  can  get  in  that 

right? 

trust fund. 

$600——

Mr.  MAY.  Senator,  I  would  encourage—I  think  we  have  seen  a 
great  deal  of  support  on  this  Committee  but  as  you,  better  than 
most, know, there are other Committees of the Congress, including 
the  Finance  Committee,  who  have  jurisdictional  priority  on  many 
of  these  taxes,  and  there  has  been  some  resistance  on  that  front. 
We  would  encourage  you  to  help  communicate  your  views  in  that 
direction, as well. 

Senator LOTT. What did you say the dollar amount is of the 4.3? 

Mr. MAY. $600 million on a 1-year basis, we are advised. 
Senator  LOTT.  One  other  question:  We  have  met  very  little  dis-
cussion  at  all  about  the  pension  bill.  Now,  I  know  your  members 
are,  maybe,  divided  on  this  issue.  We  clearly  need  pension  reform 
and we clearly need to correct some of the stupid things in the pen-
sion law where it is turned on its head, where if you are doing well, 
you pay less; if you are doing poorly, you pay more. 
The CHAIRMAN. Could you let me interrupt you? 
Senator LOTT. Yes. 
The CHAIRMAN. You said it would be profitable without that tax, 
but  you  were  not  talking  about  the  payments  you  would  owe  the 
pension  fund.  And  can  you  quantify  the  pension  fund  obligation  of 
the airlines? 

Mr. MAY. No, sir. I would be happy to collect it and provide that 
information to the Committee. We would be profitable were it not—
this  year  we  are  already  going  to  lose  about  $10  billion  this  year, 
between  $9  billion  and  $10  billion.  The  fuel—additional  fuel  costs 
impact is $9 billion of that $10 billion. And then there is a compo-
nent  in  there  for  Katrina.  Our  operating  results  would  be  signifi-
cantly better if it were not for fuel. 

Senator LOTT. Do we need to find a way to pass this Pension Re-
form Bill that has been reported out of the Finance and Help Com-
mittee in the next week? 

Mr.  MAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  there  are  a  number  of  companies  that 
are  in  my  membership  that  would  love  to  have  me  say  yes.  I  am 
not  taking  a  position  on  the  Pension  Reform  issue  as  you  are  well 
aware because I have got companies on both sides. 

Senator LOTT. Yes. You sound very senatorial. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LOTT.  You  have  friends  on  both  sides  and  you  are  with 

your friends? 

Mr. MAY. That is exactly correct, sir. 
Senator LOTT. Let me ask somebody else, then. Mr. Miller, do we 
need  to  pass  this  pension  reform?  Are  you  going  to  take  the  same 
position? 

Mr. MILLER. I will take the same position, sir. 
Senator LOTT. How about you? 
Ms.  MCELROY.  Our  Association  has  not  taken  a  position  either, 
predominately  because  the  regional  carriers  have  401k  programs. 

Senator LOTT. Yes. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

Ms.  MCELROY.  We  are  younger  companies.  So  it  is  not  an  issue. 
Senator LOTT. OK. Thank you very much. 
Senator  BURNS.  To  put  a  footnote  to  that,  if  none  of  you  have 
taken  positions  on  pensions,  how  come  we  are  in  such  a  big  prob-
lem with pensions? Somebody has not been taking positions in the 
past, I would assume. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  There  is  a  difference  in  the  way  they  were 

funded by company. 

Senator BURNS. Yes, I know, and I think it behooves us, though, 
Senator, to pass that pension package and get it out there. I really 
do.  When  you  get  right  down  and  talk  it  on  the  street,  well,  that 
is the way it is. 

Senator MCCAIN. Yes. 
Senator  BURNS.  I  am  not  real  sure  there  is  a  lot  of  legislation 
that  we  can  pass,  but  I  tell  you  that  there  are  some  things  that 
we  can  do.  We  can  cut  through  some  red  tape,  and  ask  the  DOT 
and  the  FAA  and  a  lot  of  people  who  are  involved  in  this  thing  to 
work with us and to make it work. 

Ms.  McElroy,  how  many  members  have  started  filing  the  90-day 
termination?  Are  there  any  starting  to  file  those  90-day  termi-
nation notices with the regionals? 

Ms. MCELROY. In the aftermath of Katrina? 
Senator BURNS. Yes. 
Ms.  MCELROY.  No  one  has  filed  yet,  but  there  are  several  car-

riers that are looking at it because of the increase in fuel costs. 

Senator  BURNS.  And,  the  other  day  we  had  a  hearing  in  Energy 
Committee about gouging. Would the crack spread indicate some of 
that, Dr. Gruenspecht? 

Dr.  GRUENSPECHT.  Yes,  I  think  the  crack  spread,  mostly  which 
has increased for all products and then has fallen back to the pre–
Katrina  type  of  situation,  primarily  indicates  the  supply  and  de-
mand balance in the market. 

Senator BURNS. Well, I am not real sure that—I am, sort of, hesi-
tant to—I am kind of like Senator Lott, on this market driven and 
spread  and  this  type  of  thing.  I  have  a  hard  time  understanding 
this, but I would imagine when I looked at this form right here as 
far  as  the  crack  spread  is  concerned,  I  mean,  that  is  a  drastic 
spike. That is an upturn like we have never seen before in the his-
tory of the refining or fuel business. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator? 
Senator BURNS. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Let  me  interrupt  you.  We  have  got  to  go  vote. 
David Russell here is our general counsel. We are putting together 
a package now that goes to the leadership——

Senator BURNS. That is right. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—assessment  group,  and  that  they  are  going  to 
review  and  try  to  get  joint  clearance  on  both  sides  of  these  rifle 
shots  that  Senator  Lott’s  talking  about.  Individual  things  that  we 
can  do  within  the  jurisdiction  of  this  Committee  to  make  it  easier 
for people to deal with this disaster and the recovery that we would 
like to see the airlines have, if you have any suggestions at all, get 
them to David Russell. Those will be discussed, now, next Monday, 
and it is going to be a package that moves pretty quickly, we hope. 
We  do  not  know,  yet,  but  we  hope  that  we  will  get  some  support 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

on  it,  but  I  urge  you  to  let  us  know  if  you  think  there  is  anything 
we can do to help you get through this period. 

Senator  BURNS.  My  notes—and  that  is  the  reason  we  had  this 
hearing  today.  I  think  we  have  gotten  all  the  information  that  we 
need  that  is  out  there,  private  consultation  with  each  one  of  you 
with  regard  to  the  legislation  that  is  going  to  move  and  that  will 
be  a  part  of  a  larger  package  of  a  lot  of  things  that  has  to  happen 
and be done by Monday. If you would work with our staff, with our 
staff  counsel  and  with  our  offices  individually  the  next  couple  of 
days or so, we would certainly work on those. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  One  last  comment:  The  ANWR  Bill  was  vetoed 
in 1996. If we had that pipeline filled now, we would have at least 
1.2  million  barrels  of  oil  today  than  we  have.  That  is  coming  up 
now,  again.  I  would  urge  the  industries  that  are  affected  by  this 
lack  of  supply  to  help  us  convince  the  Congress  to  go  ahead  and 
do  what  Congress  said  it  would  do  in  1980,  and  that  is  let  us  ex-
plore  that  one  and  a  half  million  acres  on  the  Arctic  slope.  At  the 
time  of  the  last  major  disaster,  we  had  2  million  barrels  a  day  in 
that pipeline. There is less than a million barrels a day right now. 
It is a national crime in my opinion. 

Mr.  MAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  you  would  note  that  we  included 

ANWR in our testimony for the first time. 

Senator BURNS. Yes, sir. 
Mr. MAY. And we will be happy to share our ideas with both you 

and Co-Chairman Inouye and his team. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  very  much.  And  we  will  close  this 
hearing. But also if you have extra comments or anything like that, 
make  them  known  to  the  individual  Members  and  to  the  Com-
mittee. Thank you very much. We are adjourned. 

[Whereupon the hearing adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
The  effects  of  Hurricane  Katrina  will  impact  our  nation  for  a  long  time,  and  the 
decisions  made  by  this  Congress  in  the  coming  months  will  provide  critical  support 
to the country as we recover from this disaster. 

There  is  no  question  that  our  aviation  system  is  critical  to  the  success  of  the 
American economy and our capacity to compete in the global marketplace. However, 
this  industry  was  struggling  long  before  Katrina  made  landfall.  The  storm  made  a 
bad  situation  worse.  Make  no  mistake,  this  Congress  will  not  let  our  aviation  sys-
tem collapse. Our actions in recent years—from direct financial bailouts to generous 
loan guarantees—demonstrate our commitment to keep the planes flying. I have fol-
lowed this issue closely, and given Hawaii’s reliance on air service, I consider it one 
of my leading priorities. 

While I strongly support a thorough examination of Katrina’s impact on the avia-
tion industry, I hope this Committee will also consider the litany of pressing issues 
that  this  catastrophe  has  raised.  Our  citizens  are  hurting  and  their  confidence  in 
government is deeply damaged. They have many questions, and so do I. 

Why  it  is  that  our  first  responders  still  cannot  communicate  with  one  another? 
What  are  we  doing  to  ensure  that  our  cities  can  evacuate  the  tens  of  thousands  of 
residents without transportation? How can we reign in gas prices and eliminate at-
tempts  to  gouge  consumers?  What  are  we  doing  to  address  our  growing,  long-term 
dependence  on  oil?  These  questions  get  at  the  heart  of  national  public  policy  and 
the very purpose of government, and all of the issues they raise are in our jurisdic-
tion. 

This Committee needs to scrutinize these issues, because they directly impact the 

livelihood and physical security of every American: 

Gas  prices  and  attempts  to  gouge  customers:  As  of  Monday,  gas  prices  offi-
cially reached an all-time high, even as adjusted for inflation. There is no doubt that 
these  astronomical  prices  are  having  a  sustained,  detrimental  impact  on  our  econ-
omy,  not  to  mention  the  finances  of  every  American  household.  We  need  to  work 
with  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  (FTC)  to  ensure  that  there  is  no  price  gouging 
involved—during this disaster or any other. 

Transportation  assets  for  mass  evacuation:  Tens  of  thousands  of  New  Orle-
ans’ most needy residents did not have resources to flee the city, and yet assets like 
trains and motor carriers were not dispatched in advance to aid the evacuation. We 
learned  that  Amtrak  trains,  which  were  poised  to  evacuate  600  people  per  trip, 
along  with  other  assets  marshaled  by  the  Department  of  Transportation,  sat  idle, 
falling victim to the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s (FEMA) disorganiza-
tion. 

Communications  interoperability:  Four  years  after  the  September  11  attacks 
on America, our first responders still cannot communicate with one another in a cri-
sis.  This  is  almost  unfathomable.  It  is  a  problem  that  must  be  solved  immediately 
if  we  are  to  effectively  manage  the  chaos  of  either  a  large-scale  terrorist  attack  or 
the next natural disaster. 

Coast Guard’s exemplary, and independent, performance: The Coast Guard 
proved  to  be  one  of  the  few  agencies  that  rose  to  the  challenges  Katrina  presented, 
rescuing over 30,000 victims in the early stages of the aftermath. The Coast Guard 
maintains a level of independence that proved critical in its response efforts. In fact, 
Homeland Security Secretary Michael Chertoff appointed Coast Guard Vice Admiral 
Thad Allen to direct the Katrina recovery efforts. FEMA, which was an independent 
agency  before  being  merged  into  the  Homeland  Security  Department,  is  now  3  ap-
pointees  removed  from  the  President,  despite  its  life-and-death,  highly  time-sen-
sitive functions. 

Fuel-efficiency standards: Katrina has demonstrated, yet again, our economy’s 
inherent  dependence  on  oil,  both  foreign-  and  domestically-produced.  It  may  very 
well  be  our  country’s  Achilles  heel,  but  it  should  not  be  this  way.  One  of  the  most 
immediate  and  effective  things  we  can  do  to  remedy  this  dependence  is  to  increase 

(35)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

the  fuel  efficiency  standards  of  our  automobiles  in  a  meaningful  way.  The  tech-
nology  currently  exists  to  double  our  oil  efficiency,  and  employing  this  technology 
would not only reduce our national dependence, it would reduce fuel costs for every 
American.  The  time  has  come  to  make  this  happen  for  the  sake  of  our  long-term 
economic strength, not to mention our long-term foreign policy. 

Insurance  coverage:  As  the  President  discovered  first  hand  on  Monday  when 
he  toured  the  Gulf  region,  insurers  are  not  coming  through  for  Katrina’s  victims. 
This industry, which is so quick to come to Congress for help when times are tough, 
is not doing the same for its premium-paying customers, who are in desperate need 
of  assistance.  We  need  to  take  a  serious  look  at  the  way  property  and  casualty  in-
surers  are  living  up  to  the  agreements  they  make  with  their  customers.  This  Com-
mittee has examined disaster insurance before, and we need to do so again. 

Given  the  gravity  and  long-term  impact  of  Katrina’s  aftermath,  our  Committee 
must  address  these  issues.  Government’s  central  purpose  is  to  protect  the  physical 
and  economic  security  of  every  American,  yet  Katrina  has  exposed  numerous  fail-
ures and vulnerabilities at all levels of government that need to be corrected imme-
diately.  We  must  do  our  part  to  resolve  these  problems  before  another  catastrophic 
natural disaster or, even worse, a large-scale terrorist attack. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  giving  us  an  opportunity 
to  discuss  this  important  issue.  The  cost  of  aviation  fuel  is  soaring  like  a  rocket. 
Airlines are being hit hard by high fuel costs, just as American families are getting 
slammed by the high price of gas. 

In 1993, aviation fuel cost twenty nine dollars ($29) per barrel. Last year, the cost 
more than doubled—and it is still rising. In the wake of Hurricane Katrina, jet fuel 
prices soared 22 percent in two days! 

Every  time  the  cost  of  aviation  fuel  increases  by  one  dollar  a  barrel,  it  costs  the 
worldwide  airline  industry  one  billion  dollars!  Those  costs  are  ultimately  paid  by 
travelers  in  the  form  of  higher  fares  or  service  cuts,  or  by  labor  in  the  form  of  cuts 
in wages or pensions. 

U.S.  airlines  lost  some  nine  billion  dollars  ($9  billion)  last  year.  The  outlook  this 
year  is  just  as  bleak.  We  all  understand  that  the  price  of  oil  is  subject  to  fluctua-
tions  in  supply  and  demand.  And  we  all  realize  that  events  like  Hurricane  Katrina 
can disrupt the supply chain. 

But  I  am  concerned  that  the  current  price  of  aviation  fuel  is  not  simply  a  reflec-
tion of free market forces. According to the International Air Transport Association, 
the  refinery  margins  for  aviation  fuel  have  almost  tripled  in  the  past  two  years—
from  six  dollars  ($6)  in  2003  to  seventeen  dollars  ($17)  today.  We  cannot  allow  the 
oil  companies  and  refineries  to  take  advantage  of  a  natural  disaster  like  Hurricane 
Katrina by gouging consumers. 

Another  major  factor  behind  rising  fuel  prices  is  the  cost  of  crude  oil,  which  is 
propped  up  by  the  OPEC  cartel.  The  whole  reason  OPEC  exists  is  to  set  quotas  on 
the production and export of oil, which drive up the price by artificially limiting the 
supply. These quotas are a burden on airlines and everyday families. 

But  they  are  prohibited  by  the  rules  of  the  World  Trade  Organization.  In  other 
words,  the  Administration  is  not  helpless  in  the  face  of  OPEC’s  cartel.  There  is 
something we can do about this. Six members of OPEC are already members of the 
WTO,  and  Saudi  Arabia  is  seeking  to  join.  I  have  called  on  the  Administration  to 
take immediate action to bust up the OPEC cartel by filing a complaint through the 
WTO. 

I have introduced a bill that would instruct the Administration to file a complaint 
against  OPEC  through  the  WTO.  But  President  Bush  doesn’t  have  to  wait  for  my 
bill to pass—he should act immediately to put pressure on OPEC. 

Finally,  our  national  transportation  system  is  especially  vulnerable  to  disasters 
that  disrupt  the  supply  of  oil  because  of  our  overwhelming  reliance  on  automobiles 
and aviation, and under-utilization of passenger rail. 

This  is  just  one  more  reminder  that  we  must  develop  a  balanced  national  trans-

portation system—and that includes passenger rail. 

I’m  proud  that  the  full  Commerce  Committee  overwhelmingly  approved  an  Am-
trak  bill  before  the  recess  that  would  help  correct  this  imbalance.  That  is  a  step  in 
the right direction.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:45 Jan 24, 2006 Jkt 025443 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25443.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

